329 | gas (noun): a fuel that burns with a blue flame | loc: Gas
  EN TS: The gas flame is blue.
  de TS: Die Gasflamme ist blau.
  EN FS: The gas flame is green.
  de FS: Die Gasflamme ist grün.
  EN TP: a blue gas flame
  de TP: eine blaue Gasflamme
  EN FP: gas in a car
  de FP: Gas im Auto
330 | gate (noun): the door where you get on a plane | loc: Gate
  EN TS: Just in time for the gate!
  de TS: Gerade noch rechtzeitig am Gate!
  EN FS: Too late for the gate!
  de FS: Zu spät fürs Gate!
  EN TP: running to the gate
  de TP: zum Gate rennen
  EN FP: a gate in a garden
  de FP: ein Tor im Garten
331 | gentleman (noun): a polite, well-mannered man | loc: Gentleman
  EN TS: A gentleman is saving the oranges!
  de TS: Ein Gentleman rettet die Orangen!
  EN FS: A gentleman is saving the apples!
  de FS: Ein Gentleman rettet die Äpfel!
  EN TP: a gentleman with an umbrella
  de TP: ein Gentleman mit Regenschirm
  EN FP: a gentleman with a dog
  de FP: ein Gentleman mit Hund
332 | giraffe (noun): a very tall animal with a long neck | loc: Giraffe
  EN TS: The giraffe is having lunch.
  de TS: Die Giraffe macht Mittagspause.
  EN FS: The lion is having lunch.
  de FS: Der Löwe macht Mittagspause.
  EN TP: a giraffe eating leaves
  de TP: eine Giraffe frisst Blätter
  EN FP: a giraffe eating grass
  de FP: eine Giraffe frisst Gras
333 | girl (noun): a female child or a young woman | loc: Mädchen
  EN TS: This girl can do everything!
  de TS: Dieses Mädchen kann einfach alles!
  EN FS: This boy can do everything!
  de FS: Dieser Junge kann einfach alles!
  EN TP: a girl skipping rope
  de TP: ein Mädchen beim Seilspringen
  EN FP: a girl skipping school
  de FP: ein Mädchen beim Schuleschwänzen
334 | glass (noun): a see-through cup for cold drinks | loc: Glas
  EN TS: Her glass is ice cold.
  de TS: Ihr Glas ist eiskalt.
  EN FS: Her glass is hot.
  de FS: Ihr Glas ist heiß.
  EN TP: a glass of lemonade
  de TP: ein Glas Limonade
  EN FP: a glass of wine
  de FP: ein Glas Wein
336 | glasses (noun): a pair of lenses in a frame you wear to see | loc: Brille
  EN TS: Glasses on, more ducks!
  de TS: Brille auf, mehr Enten!
  EN FS: Glasses on, more geese!
  de FS: Brille auf, mehr Gänse!
  EN TP: cleaning round glasses
  de TP: eine runde Brille putzen
  EN FP: breaking round glasses
  de FP: eine runde Brille zerbrechen
338 | globe (noun): a small round model of the Earth on a stand | loc: Globus
  EN TS: She is hugging her globe!
  de TS: Sie umarmt ihren Globus!
  EN FS: She is hugging her lamp!
  de FS: Sie umarmt ihre Lampe!
  EN TP: spinning a desk globe
  de TP: einen Tischglobus drehen
  EN FP: drawing a globe
  de FP: einen Globus zeichnen
339 | go (verb): to move from one place to another | loc: gehen
  EN TS: She is going down the street.
  de TS: Sie geht die Straße hinunter.
  EN FS: She is going up the stairs.
  de FS: Sie geht die Treppe hinauf.
  EN TP: to go down the street
  de TP: die Straße hinuntergehen
  EN FP: to go back home
  de FP: nach Hause zurückgehen
340 | goal (noun): the net that players kick the ball into | loc: Tor
  EN TS: They brought their own goal!
  de TS: Sie haben ihr eigenes Tor mitgebracht!
  EN FS: They brought their own bench!
  de FS: Sie haben ihre eigene Bank mitgebracht!
  EN TP: a goal on the square
  de TP: ein Tor auf dem Platz
  EN FP: a goal for next year
  de FP: ein Ziel fürs nächste Jahr
341 | goat (noun): a farm animal with horns that climbs well | loc: Ziege
  EN TS: The goat is eating laundry!
  de TS: Die Ziege frisst Wäsche!
  EN FS: The goat is eating flowers!
  de FS: Die Ziege frisst Blumen!
  EN TP: a goat on a roof
  de TP: eine Ziege auf dem Dach
  EN FP: a goat in a car
  de FP: eine Ziege im Auto
342 | goggles (noun): big glasses with a band that cover your eyes | loc: Schutzbrille | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc Schutzbrille = safety goggles; swim goggles are Schwimmbrille
  EN TS: Goggles on, super tight!
  de TS: Schwimmbrille auf, sitzt bombenfest!
  EN FS: Helmet on, super tight!
  de FS: Helm auf, sitzt bombenfest!
  EN TP: blue swim goggles
  de TP: eine blaue Schwimmbrille
  EN FP: ski goggles in the snow
  de FP: eine Skibrille im Schnee
343 | grab (verb): to take hold of something quickly and firmly | loc: packen
  EN TS: She grabbed the ring!
  de TS: Sie hat den Ring gepackt!
  EN FS: She grabbed the coin!
  de FS: Sie hat die Münze gepackt!
  EN TP: grabbing a ring underwater
  de TP: unter Wasser einen Ring packen
  EN FP: grabbing the pool ladder
  de FP: die Poolleiter packen
344 | gold (noun): a precious yellow metal worth a lot | loc: Gold
  EN TS: She loves gold a bit too much.
  de TS: Sie liebt Gold ein bisschen zu sehr.
  EN FS: She loves cats a bit too much.
  de FS: Sie liebt Katzen ein bisschen zu sehr.
  EN TP: a heavy gold bar
  de TP: ein schwerer Goldbarren
  EN FP: a gold medal
  de FP: eine Goldmedaille
346 | golf (noun): a game of hitting a small ball into holes | loc: Golf
  EN TS: Golf ball in the hole. Yes!
  de TS: Golfball im Loch. Ja!
  EN FS: Golf ball in the water. Yes!
  de FS: Golfball im Wasser. Ja!
  EN TP: a golf putt at sunset
  de TP: ein Golfputt bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a golf ball in water
  de FP: ein Golfball im Wasser
347 | gossip (noun): juicy talk about other people's private lives | loc: Klatsch
  EN TS: They love a bit of gossip.
  de TS: Sie lieben ein bisschen Klatsch.
  EN FS: They love a bit of football.
  de FS: Sie lieben ein bisschen Fußball.
  EN TP: whispering juicy gossip
  de TP: saftigen Klatsch flüstern
  EN FP: gossip in a magazine
  de FP: Klatsch in einer Zeitschrift
348 | government (noun): the group of people who officially rule a country | loc: Regierung
  EN TS: The government voted yes.
  de TS: Die Regierung hat mit Ja gestimmt.
  EN FS: The government voted no.
  de FS: Die Regierung hat mit Nein gestimmt.
  EN TP: a government vote
  de TP: eine Abstimmung der Regierung
  EN FP: a student government
  de FP: die Schülervertretung
349 | grandfather (noun): the father of your mother or father | loc: Großvater
  EN TS: Fishing, chess and a hug: best grandfather ever.
  de TS: Angeln, Schach und eine Umarmung: bester Großvater ever.
  EN FS: Fishing, chess and a hug: best grandmother ever.
  de FS: Angeln, Schach und eine Umarmung: beste Großmutter ever.
  EN TP: a grandfather and grandson
  de TP: Großvater und Enkel
  EN FP: a grandfather and his dog
  de FP: Großvater und sein Hund
350 | grandson (noun): the son of your son or daughter | loc: Enkel
  EN TS: Her grandson is home!
  de TS: Ihr Enkel ist zu Hause!
  EN FS: Her husband is home!
  de FS: Ihr Mann ist zu Hause!
  EN TP: hugging her grandson
  de TP: ihren Enkel umarmen
  EN FP: hugging her husband
  de FP: ihren Mann umarmen
351 | grass (noun): the green plants that cover lawns and fields | loc: Gras
  EN TS: They're chilling on the grass.
  de TS: Sie chillen im Gras.
  EN FS: They're chilling on the sand.
  de FS: Sie chillen im Sand.
  EN TP: lying on the soft grass
  de TP: im weichen Gras liegen
  EN FP: cutting the soft grass
  de FP: das weiche Gras mähen
352 | grill (noun): a metal frame for cooking food over heat | loc: Grill
  EN TS: The cheese has grill stripes.
  de TS: Der Käse hat Grillstreifen.
  EN FS: The bread has grill stripes.
  de FS: Das Brot hat Grillstreifen.
  EN TP: cheese on a hot grill
  de TP: Käse auf dem heißen Grill
  EN FP: fish on a hot grill
  de FP: Fisch auf dem heißen Grill
353 | guest (noun): a person you invite to your home | loc: Gast
  EN TS: The guest arrived with a gift.
  de TS: Der Gast kam mit einem Geschenk.
  EN FS: The guest arrived with a dog.
  de FS: Der Gast kam mit einem Hund.
  EN TP: welcoming a guest
  de TP: einen Gast begrüßen
  EN FP: a guest room
  de FP: ein Gästezimmer
354 | guidebook (noun): a book with facts and photos for tourists | loc: Reiseführer
  EN TS: The guidebook got it right!
  de TS: Der Reiseführer hatte recht!
  EN FS: The map got it right!
  de FS: Die Karte hatte recht!
  EN TP: a thick guidebook
  de TP: ein dicker Reiseführer
  EN FP: a thick phone book
  de FP: ein dickes Telefonbuch
355 | guilt (noun): the bad feeling after doing something wrong | loc: Schuldgefühl
  EN TS: He can't eat. Guilt!
  de TS: Er kann nichts essen. Schuldgefühle!
  EN FS: He can't sleep. Guilt!
  de FS: Er kann nicht schlafen. Schuldgefühle!
  EN TP: guilt over a broken jug
  de TP: Schuldgefühle wegen eines kaputten Krugs
  EN FP: guilt over a broken phone
  de FP: Schuldgefühle wegen eines kaputten Handys
356 | gym (noun): a place with machines where you work out | loc: Fitnessstudio
  EN TS: She will live in this gym now.
  de TS: Sie wohnt ab jetzt in diesem Fitnessstudio.
  EN FS: She will live in this pub now.
  de FS: Sie wohnt ab jetzt in dieser Kneipe.
  EN TP: a bright new gym
  de TP: ein helles neues Fitnessstudio
  EN FP: gym class at school
  de FP: Sportunterricht in der Schule
357 | hairbrush (noun): a tool for making your hair smooth and tidy | loc: Haarbürste
  EN TS: Her hairbrush is a microphone!
  de TS: Ihre Haarbürste ist ein Mikro!
  EN FS: Her comb is a microphone!
  de FS: Ihr Kamm ist ein Mikro!
  EN TP: a wooden hairbrush
  de TP: eine Haarbürste aus Holz
  EN FP: a hairbrush for a horse
  de FP: eine Haarbürste für Pferde
358 | hammer (noun): a tool for hitting nails | loc: Hammer
  EN TS: Careful work with that hammer.
  de TS: Sorgfältige Arbeit mit dem Hammer.
  EN FS: Careful work with that spoon.
  de FS: Sorgfältige Arbeit mit dem Löffel.
  EN TP: a hammer on a nail
  de TP: ein Hammer auf einem Nagel
  EN FP: a hammer in a toolbox
  de FP: ein Hammer im Werkzeugkasten
359 | hamster (noun): a small furry pet that runs in a wheel | loc: Hamster
  EN TS: Full cheeks, happy hamster.
  de TS: Volle Backen, glücklicher Hamster.
  EN FS: Empty cheeks, happy hamster.
  de FS: Leere Backen, glücklicher Hamster.
  EN TP: a hamster in a wheel
  de TP: ein Hamster im Laufrad
  EN FP: a hamster in a ball
  de FP: ein Hamster in einer Laufkugel
360 | hand sanitizer (noun): a gel that kills germs on your skin | loc: Handdesinfektionsmittel
  EN TS: Hand sanitizer, then samosas.
  de TS: Erst Handdesinfektionsmittel, dann Samosas.
  EN FS: Hand cream, then samosas.
  de FS: Erst Handcreme, dann Samosas.
  EN TP: a pump of hand sanitizer
  de TP: ein Pumpstoß Handdesinfektionsmittel
  EN FP: hand sanitizer at a door
  de FP: Handdesinfektionsmittel an der Tür
361 | wrap (verb): to cover something in paper or material | loc: einpacken | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: No flowers? Just wrap lollipops.
  de TS: Keine Blumen? Dann pack eben Lollis ein.
  EN FS: No flowers? Just wrap biscuits.
  de FS: Keine Blumen? Dann pack eben Kekse ein.
  EN TP: wrapping lollipops in paper
  de TP: Lollis in Papier einpacken
  EN FP: wrapping biscuits in paper
  de FP: Kekse in Papier einpacken
362 | happy (adjective): feeling good and full of joy | loc: glücklich
  EN TS: She is so happy it's unreal.
  de TS: Sie ist so glücklich, voll unreal.
  EN FS: She is so sad it's unreal.
  de FS: Sie ist so traurig, voll unreal.
  EN TP: a happy seaside walk
  de TP: ein glücklicher Strandspaziergang
  EN FP: a happy birthday party
  de FP: eine glückliche Geburtstagsparty
363 | research (noun): careful study of sources to find information | loc: Recherche
  EN TS: He does research all night.
  de TS: Er macht die ganze Nacht Recherche.
  EN FS: He does research all morning.
  de FS: Er macht den ganzen Morgen Recherche.
  EN TP: doing research at night
  de TP: Recherche in der Nacht
  EN FP: doing research outdoors
  de FP: Recherche im Freien
364 | artist (noun): a person who draws or paints pictures | loc: Künstler
  EN TS: He says he is not an artist.
  de TS: Er sagt, er sei kein Künstler.
  EN FS: He says he is a famous artist.
  de FS: Er sagt, er sei ein berühmter Künstler.
  EN TP: not an artist
  de TP: kein Künstler
  EN FP: an artist's big studio
  de FP: das große Atelier eines Künstlers
365 | headphones (noun): things you wear over your ears to hear music | loc: Kopfhörer
  EN TS: Her headphones are too loud!
  de TS: Ihre Kopfhörer sind zu laut!
  EN FS: Her speakers are too loud!
  de FS: Ihre Lautsprecher sind zu laut!
  EN TP: sharing the headphones
  de TP: sich die Kopfhörer teilen
  EN FP: fixing the headphones
  de FP: die Kopfhörer reparieren
366 | heal (verb): to become healthy again after an injury | loc: heilen
  EN TS: Her arm has healed. Yes!
  de TS: Ihr Arm ist geheilt. Ja!
  EN FS: Her leg has healed. Yes!
  de FS: Ihr Bein ist geheilt. Ja!
  EN TP: a healed arm
  de TP: ein geheilter Arm
  EN FP: a healed leg
  de FP: ein geheiltes Bein
367 | heat (noun): hot weather or a high temperature | loc: Hitze
  EN TS: Too much heat for an ice pop!
  de TS: Zu viel Hitze für ein Eis am Stiel!
  EN FS: Too much rain for an ice pop!
  de FS: Zu viel Regen für ein Eis am Stiel!
  EN TP: the heat in a village
  de TP: die Hitze in einem Dorf
  EN FP: the heat of a fire
  de FP: die Hitze eines Feuers
368 | helicopter (noun): an aircraft with spinning blades on top | loc: Hubschrauber
  EN TS: Delivery by helicopter? Cool!
  de TS: Lieferung per Hubschrauber? Cool!
  EN FS: Delivery by drone? Cool!
  de FS: Lieferung per Drohne? Cool!
  EN TP: a red helicopter delivery
  de TP: eine Lieferung per rotem Hubschrauber
  EN FP: a helicopter on a ship
  de FP: ein Hubschrauber auf einem Schiff
369 | ride (verb): to sit on and control a bike, horse or motorbike | loc: fahren | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is riding a motorbike.
  de TS: Er fährt Motorrad.
  EN FS: He is riding a horse.
  de FS: Er reitet ein Pferd.
  EN TP: to ride a sport motorbike
  de TP: ein Sportmotorrad fahren
  EN FP: to ride in a car
  de FP: im Auto fahren
370 | helmet (noun): a hard hat that protects your head | loc: Helm
  EN TS: The red helmet did its job.
  de TS: Der rote Helm hat seinen Job gemacht.
  EN FS: The blue helmet did its job.
  de FS: Der blaue Helm hat seinen Job gemacht.
  EN TP: a red skate helmet
  de TP: ein roter Skaterhelm
  EN FP: a helmet on a motorbike
  de FP: ein Helm auf einem Motorrad
371 | herb (noun): a plant like basil used to flavour food | loc: Kraut | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Fresh herbs for the pasta, yum.
  de TS: Frische Kräuter für die Pasta, lecker.
  EN FS: Fresh herbs for the pizza, yum.
  de FS: Frische Kräuter für die Pizza, lecker.
  EN TP: fresh herbs from the window
  de TP: frische Kräuter vom Fensterbrett
  EN FP: herb tea in a cup
  de FP: Kräutertee in der Tasse
372 | trick (noun): a clever skilful move done to impress | loc: der Trick
  EN TS: He's doing tricks on a roof.
  de TS: Er macht Tricks auf einem Dach.
  EN FS: He's doing tricks on a beach.
  de FS: Er macht Tricks an einem Strand.
  EN TP: doing tricks with a ball
  de TP: Tricks mit dem Ball
  EN FP: doing tricks with cards
  de FP: Tricks mit Karten
373 | stadium (noun): a big sports ground with seats all around | loc: Stadion
  EN TS: A stadium full of red fans.
  de TS: Ein Stadion voller roter Fans.
  EN FS: A stadium full of blue fans.
  de FS: Ein Stadion voller blauer Fans.
  EN TP: a packed football stadium
  de TP: ein volles Fußballstadion
  EN FP: an empty stadium at night
  de FP: ein leeres Stadion bei Nacht
374 | jog (verb): to run slowly at a steady pace for exercise | loc: joggen
  EN TS: He is jogging at dawn.
  de TS: Er joggt im Morgengrauen.
  EN FS: He is cycling at dawn.
  de FS: Er radelt im Morgengrauen.
  EN TP: jogging on an empty road
  de TP: auf einer leeren Straße joggen
  EN FP: jogging with a dog
  de FP: mit dem Hund joggen
375 | race car (noun): a very fast car built for racing on a track | loc: Rennwagen
  EN TS: He looks cool in a race car.
  de TS: Er sieht im Rennwagen echt cool aus.
  EN FS: He looks cool in a taxi.
  de FS: Er sieht im Taxi echt cool aus.
  EN TP: a race car at sunrise
  de TP: ein Rennwagen bei Sonnenaufgang
  EN FP: a race car at night
  de FP: ein Rennwagen bei Nacht
376 | wilderness (noun): a wild natural area where nobody lives | loc: Wildnis
  EN TS: Pure wilderness, no people.
  de TS: Pure Wildnis, keine Menschen.
  EN FS: Pure desert, no people.
  de FS: Pure Wüste, keine Menschen.
  EN TP: a river in the wilderness
  de TP: ein Fluss in der Wildnis
  EN FP: a road through the wilderness
  de FP: eine Straße durch die Wildnis
377 | perform (verb): to sing, dance or play in front of people | loc: auftreten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is performing in a studio.
  de TS: Sie tritt in einem Studio auf.
  EN FS: She is performing in a church.
  de FS: Sie tritt in einer Kirche auf.
  EN TP: performing like a music video
  de TP: auftreten wie im Musikvideo
  EN FP: performing in a big stadium
  de FP: in einem großen Stadion auftreten
378 | sunrise (noun): the moment when the sun comes up in the morning | loc: Sonnenaufgang
  EN TS: The sunrise is super golden.
  de TS: Der Sonnenaufgang ist mega golden.
  EN FS: The sunrise is super grey.
  de FS: Der Sonnenaufgang ist mega grau.
  EN TP: flying into the sunrise
  de TP: in den Sonnenaufgang fliegen
  EN FP: waking up before sunrise
  de FP: vor Sonnenaufgang aufwachen
379 | vlog (noun): a video diary someone films to share online | loc: Videoblog
  EN TS: She is filming a vlog.
  de TS: Sie filmt einen Videoblog.
  EN FS: She is filming a wedding.
  de FS: Sie filmt eine Hochzeit.
  EN TP: filming a morning vlog
  de TP: einen Morgen-Videoblog filmen
  EN FP: editing a travel vlog
  de FP: einen Reise-Videoblog schneiden
380 | journey (noun): traveling a long way from one place to another | loc: Reise
  EN TS: Her journey ended on a roof.
  de TS: Ihre Reise endete auf einem Dach.
  EN FS: Her journey ended on a boat.
  de FS: Ihre Reise endete auf einem Boot.
  EN TP: a long city journey
  de TP: eine lange Reise durch die Stadt
  EN FP: a journey by plane
  de FP: eine Reise mit dem Flugzeug
381 | scare (verb): to make someone feel afraid | loc: erschrecken
  EN TS: He is too scared to eat a grape.
  de TS: Er ist viel zu erschrocken, um eine Traube zu essen.
  EN FS: He is too scared to eat an apple.
  de FS: Er ist viel zu erschrocken, um einen Apfel zu essen.
  EN TP: to scare a friend
  de TP: einen Freund erschrecken
  EN FP: to scare birds away
  de FP: Vögel erschrecken
382 | high (adjective): far above the ground | loc: hoch
  EN TS: Wow, they work so high!
  de TS: Wow, die arbeiten so hoch oben!
  EN FS: Wow, they work so low!
  de FS: Wow, die arbeiten so tief unten!
  EN TP: high above the street
  de TP: hoch über der Straße
  EN FP: high on a mountain
  de FP: hoch auf einem Berg
383 | hiking (noun): walking a long way in nature for fun | loc: Wandern
  EN TS: Hiking all the way to the top!
  de TS: Wandern bis ganz nach oben!
  EN FS: Skiing all the way to the top!
  de FS: Skifahren bis ganz nach oben!
  EN TP: hiking up a mountain
  de TP: Wandern auf einen Berg
  EN FP: hiking in the desert
  de FP: Wandern in der Wüste
385 | hit (verb): to bring your hand or a bat hard against something | loc: schlagen
  EN TS: She hit it high into the sky!
  de TS: Sie hat ihn hoch in den Himmel geschlagen!
  EN FS: She hit it low into the grass!
  de FS: Sie hat ihn flach ins Gras geschlagen!
  EN TP: hitting the ball high
  de TP: den Ball hoch schlagen
  EN FP: hitting a ball into water
  de FP: den Ball ins Wasser schlagen
386 | hobby (noun): something you do for fun in your free time | loc: Hobby
  EN TS: His hobby is building models.
  de TS: Sein Hobby ist, Modelle zu bauen.
  EN FS: His hobby is building houses.
  de FS: Sein Hobby ist, Häuser zu bauen.
  EN TP: a hobby with model ships
  de TP: ein Hobby mit Schiffsmodellen
  EN FP: a hobby with real ships
  de FP: ein Hobby mit echten Schiffen
387 | security camera (noun): a camera that films a home to keep it safe | loc: Überwachungskamera
  EN TS: Security camera: the dog did it.
  de TS: Überwachungskamera: Der Hund war's.
  EN FS: Security camera: the cat did it.
  de FS: Überwachungskamera: Die Katze war's.
  EN TP: night security camera footage
  de TP: nächtliche Bilder der Überwachungskamera
  EN FP: a shop security camera
  de FP: eine Überwachungskamera im Laden
388 | homework (noun): tasks a teacher gives you to do after school | loc: Hausaufgaben
  EN TS: Her homework never ends.
  de TS: Ihre Hausaufgaben hören nie auf.
  EN FS: Her holiday never ends.
  de FS: Ihre Ferien hören nie auf.
  EN TP: homework late at night
  de TP: Hausaufgaben spät in der Nacht
  EN FP: homework on the bus
  de FP: Hausaufgaben im Bus
389 | honey (noun): a sweet sticky food made by bees | loc: Honig
  EN TS: The honey is so slow!
  de TS: Der Honig ist so langsam!
  EN FS: The honey is so fast!
  de FS: Der Honig ist so schnell!
  EN TP: honey on a wooden dipper
  de TP: Honig an einem Holzlöffel
  EN FP: honey in tea
  de FP: Honig im Tee
390 | hoodie (noun): a soft sweatshirt with a hood on the back | loc: Hoodie
  EN TS: His hoodie is super cozy.
  de TS: Sein Hoodie ist mega gemütlich.
  EN FS: His jacket is super cozy.
  de FS: Seine Jacke ist mega gemütlich.
  EN TP: pulling up a hoodie
  de TP: die Kapuze vom Hoodie aufsetzen
  EN FP: washing a hoodie
  de FP: einen Hoodie waschen
391 | hope (noun): a feeling that something good will happen | loc: Hoffnung
  EN TS: The boat is back. Hope wins!
  de TS: Das Boot ist zurück. Die Hoffnung siegt!
  EN FS: The plane is back. Hope wins!
  de FS: Das Flugzeug ist zurück. Die Hoffnung siegt!
  EN TP: hope for the boat
  de TP: Hoffnung auf das Boot
  EN FP: hope for good weather
  de FP: Hoffnung auf gutes Wetter
392 | horse (noun): a large animal people ride | loc: Pferd
  EN TS: She is riding the horse.
  de TS: Sie reitet das Pferd.
  EN FS: She is riding the camel.
  de FS: Sie reitet das Kamel.
  EN TP: a horse and its rider
  de TP: ein Pferd mit Reiterin
  EN FP: a horse and its cart
  de FP: ein Pferd mit Kutsche
393 | hostel (noun): a cheap place to sleep in shared rooms | loc: Hostel
  EN TS: A hostel bed costs ten euros.
  de TS: Ein Bett im Hostel kostet zehn Euro.
  EN FS: A hostel bed costs six euros.
  de FS: Ein Bett im Hostel kostet sechs Euro.
  EN TP: a bunk in a hostel
  de TP: ein Stockbett im Hostel
  EN FP: a room in a hotel
  de FP: ein Zimmer im Hotel
394 | hot (adjective): having a high temperature | loc: heiß
  EN TS: Too hot! He is hugging the fan.
  de TS: Zu heiß! Er umarmt den Ventilator.
  EN FS: Too hot! He is hugging the dog.
  de FS: Zu heiß! Er umarmt den Hund.
  EN TP: a hot sunny day
  de TP: ein heißer, sonniger Tag
  EN FP: a hot cup of tea
  de FP: eine heiße Tasse Tee
395 | house (noun): a building where a family lives | loc: Haus
  EN TS: Best house in the whole world!
  de TS: Bestes Haus der ganzen Welt!
  EN FS: Best car in the whole world!
  de FS: Bestes Auto der ganzen Welt!
  EN TP: moving into a yellow house
  de TP: in ein gelbes Haus einziehen
  EN FP: moving into a white house
  de FP: in ein weißes Haus einziehen
396 | hug (noun): a close hold with your arms around someone | loc: Umarmung
  EN TS: That is the hug of the year!
  de TS: Das ist die Umarmung des Jahres!
  EN FS: That is the fight of the year!
  de FS: Das ist der Streit des Jahres!
  EN TP: a huge spinning hug
  de TP: eine riesige Umarmung im Kreis
  EN FP: a quick goodbye hug
  de FP: eine kurze Abschiedsumarmung
397 | hunting (noun): following and trying to catch wild animals | loc: Jagd
  EN TS: They are hunting in the forest.
  de TS: Sie sind im Wald auf der Jagd.
  EN FS: They are hunting in the desert.
  de FS: Sie sind in der Wüste auf der Jagd.
  EN TP: hunting in an autumn forest
  de TP: Jagd im Herbstwald
  EN FP: hunting in the snow
  de FP: Jagd im Schnee
398 | hygiene (noun): keeping your body clean to stay healthy | loc: Hygiene
  EN TS: Hygiene first, then thumbs up.
  de TS: Erst Hygiene, dann Daumen hoch.
  EN FS: Hygiene first, then high five.
  de FS: Erst Hygiene, dann High five.
  EN TP: good hygiene in the bathroom
  de TP: gute Hygiene im Bad
  EN FP: good hygiene in the kitchen
  de FP: gute Hygiene in der Küche
399 | ice cream (noun): a cold sweet frozen food made from milk | loc: Eis
  EN TS: He is losing to his ice cream.
  de TS: Er verliert gegen sein Eis.
  EN FS: He is losing to his hot dog.
  de FS: Er verliert gegen seinen Hotdog.
  EN TP: melting ice cream
  de TP: schmelzendes Eis
  EN FP: ice cream in a cup
  de FP: Eis im Becher
400 | ice hockey (noun): a team game on frozen water with sticks and a puck | loc: Eishockey
  EN TS: Number 9 plays ice hockey.
  de TS: Nummer 9 spielt Eishockey.
  EN FS: Number 7 plays ice hockey.
  de FS: Nummer 7 spielt Eishockey.
  EN TP: ice hockey on a rink
  de TP: Eishockey auf der Eisbahn
  EN FP: ice hockey on a pond
  de FP: Eishockey auf einem Teich
401 | ice skates (noun): boots with blades for gliding on frozen water | loc: Schlittschuhe
  EN TS: Nice stop on those ice skates.
  de TS: Schöner Stopp auf den Schlittschuhen.
  EN FS: Nice stop on that snowboard.
  de FS: Schöner Stopp auf dem Snowboard.
  EN TP: lacing up ice skates
  de TP: Schlittschuhe schnüren
  EN FP: ice skates on a shelf
  de FP: Schlittschuhe im Regal
402 | ice (noun): water that has frozen hard | loc: Eis
  EN TS: She is sliding on the ice.
  de TS: Sie rutscht übers Eis.
  EN FS: She is sliding on the grass.
  de FS: Sie rutscht übers Gras.
  EN TP: bubbles in the ice
  de TP: Blasen im Eis
  EN FP: ice in a drink
  de FP: Eis im Getränk
404 | classroom (noun): a room where a teacher teaches students | loc: Klassenzimmer
  EN TS: Chaos in the classroom, but he is calm.
  de TS: Chaos im Klassenzimmer, aber er bleibt ruhig.
  EN FS: Chaos in the kitchen, but he is calm.
  de FS: Chaos in der Küche, aber er bleibt ruhig.
  EN TP: a noisy classroom
  de TP: ein lautes Klassenzimmer
  EN FP: a quiet classroom
  de FP: ein stilles Klassenzimmer
405 | inside (adverb): into or in a building or room | loc: drinnen
  EN TS: Snow outside, friends inside.
  de TS: Draußen Schnee, drinnen Freunde.
  EN FS: Snow outside, dogs inside.
  de FS: Draußen Schnee, drinnen Hunde.
  EN TP: warm inside the cabin
  de TP: warm drinnen in der Hütte
  EN FP: inside a tent
  de FP: drinnen im Zelt
406 | iron (noun): the strong grey metal a blacksmith works with | loc: Eisen
  EN TS: He is hammering hot iron.
  de TS: Er hämmert heißes Eisen.
  EN FS: He is hammering hot glass.
  de FS: Er hämmert heißes Glas.
  EN TP: hammering hot iron
  de TP: heißes Eisen hämmern
  EN FP: ironing a hot shirt
  de FP: ein heißes Hemd bügeln
407 | island (noun): a piece of land with water all around it | loc: Insel
  EN TS: No way! A whole island for two!
  de TS: Krass! Eine ganze Insel für zwei!
  EN FS: No way! A whole island for ten!
  de FS: Krass! Eine ganze Insel für zehn!
  EN TP: a small tropical island
  de TP: eine kleine tropische Insel
  EN FP: an island in a kitchen
  de FP: eine Kücheninsel
408 | jacket (noun): a short coat that covers your arms and top | loc: Jacke
  EN TS: The jacket is on. Much better.
  de TS: Jacke an. Viel besser.
  EN FS: The scarf is on. Much better.
  de FS: Schal an. Viel besser.
  EN TP: zipping up a brown jacket
  de TP: eine braune Jacke zumachen
  EN FP: a jacket on a chair
  de FP: eine Jacke auf einem Stuhl
410 | jam (noun): a sweet spread made from fruit and sugar | loc: Marmelade | translator note: English FP pun (traffic jam) does not travel
  EN TS: She is spreading jam thickly.
  de TS: Sie streicht die Marmelade dick auf.
  EN FS: She is spreading jam thinly.
  de FS: Sie streicht die Marmelade dünn auf.
  EN TP: jam on toast
  de TP: Marmelade auf Toast
  EN FP: a traffic jam
  de FP: Marmelade im Kuchen
411 | jealous (adjective): upset that someone else got what you wanted | loc: eifersüchtig
  EN TS: Wow, she is so jealous.
  de TS: Wow, sie ist so eifersüchtig.
  EN FS: Wow, he is so jealous.
  de FS: Wow, er ist so eifersüchtig.
  EN TP: jealous of another dancer
  de TP: eifersüchtig auf eine andere Tänzerin
  EN FP: jealous of her teacher
  de FP: eifersüchtig auf ihre Lehrerin
413 | juice (noun): the liquid you get by pressing fruit | loc: Saft
  EN TS: The juice is ruby red.
  de TS: Der Saft ist rubinrot.
  EN FS: The juice is bright orange.
  de FS: Der Saft ist knallorange.
  EN TP: fresh pomegranate juice
  de TP: frischer Granatapfelsaft
  EN FP: orange juice in a box
  de FP: Orangensaft im Tetrapak
414 | jump (verb): to push yourself off the ground into the air | loc: springen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He jumped over the bar!
  de TS: Er ist über die Latte gesprungen!
  EN FS: He jumped over the fence!
  de FS: Er ist über den Zaun gesprungen!
  EN TP: to jump over the bar
  de TP: über die Latte springen
  EN FP: to jump into the pool
  de FP: in den Pool springen
415 | kangaroo (noun): an Australian animal that hops on big back legs | loc: Känguru
  EN TS: This kangaroo has a passenger.
  de TS: Dieses Känguru hat einen Passagier.
  EN FS: This koala has a passenger.
  de FS: Dieser Koala hat einen Passagier.
  EN TP: a kangaroo with a joey
  de TP: ein Känguru mit Jungtier
  EN FP: a kangaroo with boxing gloves
  de FP: ein Känguru mit Boxhandschuhen
416 | ketchup (noun): a thick red tomato sauce for fries | loc: Ketchup
  EN TS: The ketchup finally gave up!
  de TS: Der Ketchup hat endlich aufgegeben!
  EN FS: The mustard finally gave up!
  de FS: Der Senf hat endlich aufgegeben!
  EN TP: ketchup on fries
  de TP: Ketchup auf Pommes
  EN FP: ketchup on a burger
  de FP: Ketchup auf einem Burger
418 | keychain (noun): a small ring or charm that holds your keys | loc: Schlüsselanhänger
  EN TS: She made her own keychain.
  de TS: Sie hat ihren Schlüsselanhänger selbst gemacht.
  EN FS: She made her own necklace.
  de FS: Sie hat ihre Halskette selbst gemacht.
  EN TP: a keychain with a pompom
  de TP: ein Schlüsselanhänger mit Bommel
  EN FP: a keychain with a photo
  de FP: ein Schlüsselanhänger mit Foto
419 | kick (verb): to hit something with your foot | loc: kicken
  EN TS: They are kicking a ball.
  de TS: Sie kicken einen Ball.
  EN FS: They are throwing a ball.
  de FS: Sie werfen einen Ball.
  EN TP: kicking a ball around
  de TP: einen Ball herumkicken
  EN FP: kicking a door open
  de FP: eine Tür auftreten
422 | kicking (noun): hitting something again and again with your foot | loc: Treten
  EN TS: Her kicking is super high.
  de TS: Beim Treten kommt sie mega hoch.
  EN FS: Her kicking is super low.
  de FS: Beim Treten kommt sie nur mega tief.
  EN TP: kicking a punching bag
  de TP: gegen einen Boxsack treten
  EN FP: kicking a football
  de FP: gegen einen Fußball treten
423 | kiss (verb): to touch someone with your lips to show love | loc: küssen | translator note: restructured so the TS contains küssen
  EN TS: He caught her kiss!
  de TS: Sie küsst ihre Hand und pustet – er fängt den Kuss!
  EN FS: She caught his kiss!
  de FS: Er küsst seine Hand und pustet – sie fängt den Kuss!
  EN TP: blowing a kiss
  de TP: einen Kuss zuwerfen
  EN FP: a goodnight kiss
  de FP: ein Gutenachtkuss
424 | knife (noun): a tool with a sharp blade for cutting | loc: Messer
  EN TS: His knife is cutting bread.
  de TS: Sein Messer schneidet Brot.
  EN FS: His knife is cutting cheese.
  de FS: Sein Messer schneidet Käse.
  EN TP: a large bread knife
  de TP: ein großes Brotmesser
  EN FP: a small pocket knife
  de FP: ein kleines Taschenmesser
426 | ladder (noun): a set of steps you lean on a wall to climb | loc: Leiter
  EN TS: She is climbing; he is just holding the ladder.
  de TS: Sie klettert, er hält nur die Leiter.
  EN FS: She is climbing; he is just holding the basket.
  de FS: Sie klettert, er hält nur den Korb.
  EN TP: holding the ladder steady
  de TP: die Leiter festhalten
  EN FP: painting the ladder
  de FP: die Leiter streichen
427 | ladybug (noun): a small red beetle with black spots | loc: Marienkäfer
  EN TS: The ladybug is flying away.
  de TS: Der Marienkäfer fliegt weg.
  EN FS: The ladybug is eating a leaf.
  de FS: Der Marienkäfer frisst ein Blatt.
  EN TP: a ladybug on the grass
  de TP: ein Marienkäfer im Gras
  EN FP: a ladybug on a hand
  de FP: ein Marienkäfer auf einer Hand
428 | lake (noun): a large area of water with land all around it | loc: See
  EN TS: A canoe on a calm lake.
  de TS: Ein Kanu auf einem ruhigen See.
  EN FS: A canoe on a calm sea.
  de FS: Ein Kanu auf einem ruhigen Meer.
  EN TP: a calm mountain lake
  de TP: ein ruhiger Bergsee
  EN FP: a frozen lake
  de FP: ein zugefrorener See
429 | land (verb): to come down to the ground after flying | loc: landen
  EN TS: She landed it perfectly!
  de TS: Sie ist perfekt gelandet!
  EN FS: She landed in the water!
  de FS: Sie ist im Wasser gelandet!
  EN TP: landing on a grassy field
  de TP: auf einer Wiese landen
  EN FP: landing a plane
  de FP: ein Flugzeug landen
430 | language (noun): the words people use to speak and write | loc: Sprache
  EN TS: He is teaching her his language.
  de TS: Er bringt ihr seine Sprache bei.
  EN FS: She is teaching him her language.
  de FS: Sie bringt ihm ihre Sprache bei.
  EN TP: learning a new language
  de TP: eine neue Sprache lernen
  EN FP: a language app lesson
  de FP: eine Lektion in der Sprach-App
431 | lazy (adjective): not wanting to work or make any effort | loc: faul
  EN TS: Lazy? No, he is a "genius".
  de TS: Faul? Nein, er ist ein „Genie“.
  EN FS: Lazy? No, she is a "genius".
  de FS: Faul? Nein, sie ist ein „Genie“.
  EN TP: a lazy man at home
  de TP: ein fauler Mann zu Hause
  EN FP: a lazy cat at home
  de FP: eine faule Katze zu Hause
432 | lead (verb): to go in front and show others the way | loc: führen
  EN TS: She's leading with a lantern.
  de TS: Sie führt mit einer Laterne.
  EN FS: She's leading with a torch.
  de FS: Sie führt mit einer Taschenlampe.
  EN TP: leading hikers with a lantern
  de TP: Wanderer mit einer Laterne führen
  EN FP: leading hikers with a map
  de FP: Wanderer mit einer Karte führen
435 | leather (noun): animal skin used to make shoes, bags and jackets | loc: Leder
  EN TS: The leather is creaking!
  de TS: Das Leder knarzt!
  EN FS: The floor is creaking!
  de FS: Der Boden knarzt!
  EN TP: stretching leather
  de TP: Leder dehnen
  EN FP: a leather sofa
  de FP: ein Ledersofa
436 | left (adverb): toward the side where your heart is | loc: links
  EN TS: Everyone is stepping left.
  de TS: Alle machen einen Schritt nach links.
  EN FS: Everyone is stepping right.
  de FS: Alle machen einen Schritt nach rechts.
  EN TP: to step to the left
  de TP: einen Schritt nach links machen
  EN FP: to jump to the left
  de FP: nach links springen
437 | leg (noun): one of the long body parts you walk on | loc: Bein
  EN TS: She is stretching her leg.
  de TS: Sie dehnt ihr Bein.
  EN FS: She is stretching her arm.
  de FS: Sie dehnt ihren Arm.
  EN TP: a leg on the wall
  de TP: ein Bein an der Wand
  EN FP: a leg in a cast
  de FP: ein Bein im Gips
438 | lemon (noun): a sour yellow fruit | loc: Zitrone
  EN TS: The lemon is way too sour!
  de TS: Die Zitrone ist viel zu sauer!
  EN FS: The lemon is way too sweet!
  de FS: Die Zitrone ist viel zu süß!
  EN TP: biting a lemon wedge
  de TP: in eine Zitronenspalte beißen
  EN FP: a lemon cake
  de FP: ein Zitronenkuchen
439 | lemonade (noun): a cold sweet drink made with sour yellow fruit | loc: Limonade
  EN TS: The lemonade is super cold.
  de TS: Die Limonade ist mega kalt.
  EN FS: The lemonade is super hot.
  de FS: Die Limonade ist mega heiß.
  EN TP: a jar of lemonade
  de TP: Limonade im Einmachglas
  EN FP: a can of lemonade
  de FP: Limonade in der Dose
440 | lifting (noun): raising something heavy up off the ground | loc: Heben
  EN TS: He is lifting a barbell!
  de TS: Er hebt eine Langhantel!
  EN FS: He is lifting a sofa!
  de FS: Er hebt ein Sofa!
  EN TP: lifting a heavy barbell
  de TP: eine schwere Langhantel heben
  EN FP: lifting a small child
  de FP: ein kleines Kind heben
442 | teamwork (noun): people working together to get something done | loc: Teamarbeit
  EN TS: Teamwork beats one heavy box.
  de TS: Teamarbeit schlägt eine schwere Kiste.
  EN FS: Teamwork beats one heavy sofa.
  de FS: Teamarbeit schlägt ein schweres Sofa.
  EN TP: teamwork with a heavy box
  de TP: Teamarbeit mit einer schweren Kiste
  EN FP: teamwork on a football pitch
  de FP: Teamarbeit auf dem Fußballplatz
443 | light (noun): the brightness that lets you see things | loc: Licht
  EN TS: Finally, light in the attic!
  de TS: Endlich Licht auf dem Dachboden!
  EN FS: Finally, light in the kitchen!
  de FS: Endlich Licht in der Küche!
  EN TP: light through the window
  de TP: Licht durchs Fenster
  EN FP: light from a candle
  de FP: Licht von einer Kerze
444 | lightning (noun): the bright electric flash in a storm sky | loc: Blitz
  EN TS: Lightning! Did you see that?
  de TS: Blitz! Hast du das gesehen?
  EN FS: Rainbow! Did you see that?
  de FS: Regenbogen! Hast du das gesehen?
  EN TP: watching lightning at night
  de TP: nachts Blitze beobachten
  EN FP: lightning in the daytime
  de FP: ein Blitz am helllichten Tag
445 | line (noun): a long thin mark on a surface | loc: Linie
  EN TS: Her white line is perfect!
  de TS: Ihre weiße Linie ist perfekt!
  EN FS: Her yellow line is perfect!
  de FS: Ihre gelbe Linie ist perfekt!
  EN TP: painting a white line
  de TP: eine weiße Linie malen
  EN FP: a line of people
  de FP: eine Schlange von Leuten
446 | lion (noun): a big wild cat with a mane that roars | loc: Löwe
  EN TS: The lion is roaring at us!
  de TS: Der Löwe brüllt uns an!
  EN FS: The lion is running at us!
  de FS: Der Löwe rennt auf uns zu!
  EN TP: a lion in the grass
  de TP: ein Löwe im Gras
  EN FP: a lion in a cage
  de FP: ein Löwe im Käfig
447 | lip balm (noun): a stick of cream that keeps your mouth soft | loc: Lippenbalsam
  EN TS: Lip balm saves the day!
  de TS: Lippenbalsam rettet den Tag!
  EN FS: Hand cream saves the day!
  de FS: Handcreme rettet den Tag!
  EN TP: putting on lip balm
  de TP: Lippenbalsam auftragen
  EN FP: buying a lip balm
  de FP: Lippenbalsam kaufen
448 | lip gloss (noun): shiny liquid makeup painted on the lips | loc: Lipgloss
  EN TS: Lip gloss as shiny as glass.
  de TS: Lipgloss, glänzend wie Glas.
  EN FS: Lip gloss as matte as paper.
  de FS: Lipgloss, matt wie Papier.
  EN TP: shiny pink lip gloss
  de TP: glänzender rosa Lipgloss
  EN FP: dark red lip gloss
  de FP: dunkelroter Lipgloss
449 | listening (noun): paying attention to sounds you hear | loc: Zuhören | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Shh, they are listening!
  de TS: Pst, sie hören zu!
  EN FS: Shh, they are sleeping!
  de FS: Pst, sie schlafen!
  EN TP: listening in the forest
  de TP: Zuhören im Wald
  EN FP: listening to music
  de FP: Musik hören
450 | lizard (noun): a small reptile with four legs and a long tail | loc: Eidechse
  EN TS: The lizard is sunbathing.
  de TS: Die Eidechse sonnt sich.
  EN FS: The lizard is swimming.
  de FS: Die Eidechse schwimmt.
  EN TP: a lizard on a wall
  de TP: eine Eidechse an der Wand
  EN FP: a lizard in a box
  de FP: eine Eidechse in einer Kiste
451 | lock (verb): to close something with a key | loc: abschließen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is locking the door.
  de TS: Sie schließt die Tür ab.
  EN FS: She is opening the door.
  de FS: Sie macht die Tür auf.
  EN TP: locking a boat door
  de TP: eine Bootstür abschließen
  EN FP: locking a car door
  de FP: eine Autotür abschließen
452 | logo (noun): the small symbol that represents a company | loc: Logo
  EN TS: They even put the logo on the dog!
  de TS: Die haben das Logo sogar auf den Hund gepackt!
  EN FS: They even put the logo on the cat!
  de FS: Die haben das Logo sogar auf die Katze gepackt!
  EN TP: a logo on a collar
  de TP: ein Logo auf einem Halsband
  EN FP: a logo on a T-shirt
  de FP: ein Logo auf einem T-Shirt
453 | lonely (adjective): sad because you are all alone | loc: einsam
  EN TS: He is lonely in the cafeteria.
  de TS: Er ist einsam in der Mensa.
  EN FS: He is lonely in the library.
  de FS: Er ist einsam in der Bibliothek.
  EN TP: a lonely lunch
  de TP: ein einsames Mittagessen
  EN FP: a lonely walk home
  de FP: ein einsamer Heimweg
454 | love (noun): a strong feeling of caring for someone | loc: Liebe
  EN TS: Soup and a blanket: pure love.
  de TS: Suppe und eine Decke: pure Liebe.
  EN FS: Tea and a blanket: pure love.
  de FS: Tee und eine Decke: pure Liebe.
  EN TP: love on a rainy night
  de TP: Liebe in einer Regennacht
  EN FP: love at first sight
  de FP: Liebe auf den ersten Blick
455 | lungs (noun): the two organs in your chest you breathe with | loc: Lunge
  EN TS: She has super strong lungs.
  de TS: Sie hat eine mega starke Lunge.
  EN FS: He has super strong lungs.
  de FS: Er hat eine mega starke Lunge.
  EN TP: lungs full of air
  de TP: eine Lunge voller Luft
  EN FP: lungs full of smoke
  de FP: eine Lunge voller Rauch
456 | magazine (noun): a thin paper book with photos, printed monthly | loc: Zeitschrift
  EN TS: The magazine is hers now.
  de TS: Die Zeitschrift gehört jetzt ihr.
  EN FS: The newspaper is hers now.
  de FS: Die Zeitung gehört jetzt ihr.
  EN TP: flipping through a magazine
  de TP: in einer Zeitschrift blättern
  EN FP: a magazine on a train
  de FP: eine Zeitschrift im Zug
457 | makeup (noun): creams and colours put on the face to look good | loc: Make-up
  EN TS: An artist is doing her makeup.
  de TS: Ein Profi macht ihr Make-up.
  EN FS: An artist is doing her hair.
  de FS: Ein Profi macht ihr die Haare.
  EN TP: doing makeup at a mirror
  de TP: Make-up vor dem Spiegel auftragen
  EN FP: removing makeup at a mirror
  de FP: Make-up vor dem Spiegel entfernen
458 | man (noun): an adult male person | loc: Mann
  EN TS: A big man is carrying a crate.
  de TS: Ein großer Mann trägt eine Kiste.
  EN FS: A big man is carrying a dog.
  de FS: Ein großer Mann trägt einen Hund.
  EN TP: men playing chess
  de TP: Männer beim Schach
  EN FP: men playing cards
  de FP: Männer beim Kartenspielen
459 | manager (noun): the person in charge who tells a team what to do | loc: Manager
  EN TS: The manager is giving orders.
  de TS: Der Manager verteilt Befehle.
  EN FS: The manager is giving flowers.
  de FS: Der Manager verteilt Blumen.
  EN TP: a manager with a clipboard
  de TP: ein Manager mit Klemmbrett
  EN FP: a football team manager
  de FP: ein Manager im Fußball
461 | mannequin (noun): a life-size dummy that displays clothes in a shop | loc: Schaufensterpuppe
  EN TS: He is copying the mannequin. Twins!
  de TS: Er macht die Schaufensterpuppe nach. Zwillinge!
  EN FS: He is painting the mannequin. Twins!
  de FS: Er bemalt die Schaufensterpuppe. Zwillinge!
  EN TP: dressing a mannequin
  de TP: eine Schaufensterpuppe anziehen
  EN FP: a mannequin in a window
  de FP: eine Schaufensterpuppe im Schaufenster
462 | map (noun): a drawing of an area that shows roads and places | loc: Karte
  EN TS: The map found the fountain!
  de TS: Die Karte hat den Brunnen gefunden!
  EN FS: The map found the church!
  de FS: Die Karte hat die Kirche gefunden!
  EN TP: a big paper map
  de TP: eine große Papierkarte
  EN FP: a map on a phone
  de FP: eine Karte auf dem Handy
464 | marker (noun): a pen with a thick soft tip | loc: Marker
  EN TS: She is drawing with a marker.
  de TS: Sie malt mit einem Marker.
  EN FS: She is drawing with chalk.
  de FS: Sie malt mit Kreide.
  EN TP: a thick pink marker
  de TP: ein dicker pinker Marker
  EN FP: a marker on a whiteboard
  de FP: ein Marker am Whiteboard
465 | market (noun): a place where people buy and sell food and goods | loc: Markt
  EN TS: She is shopping at a market.
  de TS: Sie kauft auf dem Markt ein.
  EN FS: She is shopping at a mall.
  de FS: Sie kauft im Einkaufszentrum ein.
  EN TP: a busy street market
  de TP: ein belebter Straßenmarkt
  EN FP: a busy street party
  de FP: ein belebtes Straßenfest
466 | mascara (noun): dark makeup brushed onto the eyelashes | loc: Wimperntusche
  EN TS: The mascara face: mouth wide open.
  de TS: Das Wimperntusche-Gesicht: Mund weit offen.
  EN FS: The mascara face: eyes shut tight.
  de FS: Das Wimperntusche-Gesicht: Augen fest zu.
  EN TP: brushing on black mascara
  de TP: schwarze Wimperntusche auftragen
  EN FP: mascara running down cheeks
  de FP: verlaufene Wimperntusche auf den Wangen
467 | master (noun): a person with great skill others learn from | loc: Meister
  EN TS: The master is shaping a vase.
  de TS: Der Meister formt eine Vase.
  EN FS: The master is painting a vase.
  de FS: Der Meister bemalt eine Vase.
  EN TP: a pottery master
  de TP: ein Töpfermeister
  EN FP: a master at the piano
  de FP: ein Meister am Klavier
468 | mat (noun): a soft flat piece you lie or stand on | loc: Matte
  EN TS: They are on their yoga mats.
  de TS: Sie liegen auf ihren Yogamatten.
  EN FS: They are on their towels.
  de FS: Sie liegen auf ihren Handtüchern.
  EN TP: a purple yoga mat
  de TP: eine lila Yogamatte
  EN FP: a mat at the door
  de FP: eine Fußmatte an der Tür
469 | matches (noun): small sticks that make fire when struck | loc: Streichhölzer | translator note: English FP pun (matches on TV) does not travel
  EN TS: These matches work first time!
  de TS: Diese Streichhölzer zünden beim ersten Mal!
  EN FS: This lighter works first time!
  de FS: Dieses Feuerzeug zündet beim ersten Mal!
  EN TP: a box of matches
  de TP: eine Schachtel Streichhölzer
  EN FP: matches on television
  de FP: nasse Streichhölzer
470 | meadow (noun): a field of wild grass and flowers | loc: Wiese
  EN TS: They fell into the meadow.
  de TS: Sie sind in die Wiese gefallen.
  EN FS: They fell into the river.
  de FS: Sie sind in den Fluss gefallen.
  EN TP: a meadow full of poppies
  de TP: eine Wiese voller Mohnblumen
  EN FP: a meadow full of cows
  de FP: eine Wiese voller Kühe
471 | meat (noun): food that comes from animals | loc: Fleisch
  EN TS: The dog wants the meat.
  de TS: Der Hund will das Fleisch.
  EN FS: The cat wants the meat.
  de FS: Die Katze will das Fleisch.
  EN TP: grilled meat on a board
  de TP: gegrilltes Fleisch auf einem Brett
  EN FP: raw meat in a shop
  de FP: rohes Fleisch im Laden
472 | mechanic (noun): a person whose job is to fix cars | loc: Mechaniker
  EN TS: The mechanic is fixing a car.
  de TS: Der Mechaniker repariert ein Auto.
  EN FS: The mechanic is fixing a bike.
  de FS: Der Mechaniker repariert ein Fahrrad.
  EN TP: a mechanic in a garage
  de TP: ein Mechaniker in der Werkstatt
  EN FP: a mechanic on the road
  de FP: ein Mechaniker auf der Straße
473 | medal (noun): a round metal prize you wear around your neck | loc: Medaille
  EN TS: She is biting her gold medal. Real gold?
  de TS: Sie beißt in ihre Goldmedaille. Echtes Gold?
  EN FS: She is biting her gold ring. Real gold?
  de FS: Sie beißt in ihren Goldring. Echtes Gold?
  EN TP: biting a gold medal
  de TP: in eine Goldmedaille beißen
  EN FP: a medal in a box
  de FP: eine Medaille in einer Schachtel
474 | meditation (noun): sitting still and breathing to calm the mind | loc: Meditation
  EN TS: Group meditation at sunset.
  de TS: Gruppenmeditation bei Sonnenuntergang.
  EN FS: Group meditation on a beach.
  de FS: Gruppenmeditation am Strand.
  EN TP: meditation on a wooden deck
  de TP: Meditation auf einer Holzterrasse
  EN FP: meditation in a temple
  de FP: Meditation im Tempel
475 | memory (noun): something from the past that you remember | loc: Erinnerung
  EN TS: Each memory makes her smile.
  de TS: Jede Erinnerung bringt sie zum Lächeln.
  EN FS: Each memory makes her cry.
  de FS: Jede Erinnerung bringt sie zum Weinen.
  EN TP: a box of old memories
  de TP: eine Kiste voller Erinnerungen
  EN FP: a camera memory card
  de FP: eine Speicherkarte für die Kamera
476 | microscope (noun): a lens tool that makes tiny things look huge | loc: Mikroskop
  EN TS: He is using a microscope.
  de TS: Er benutzt ein Mikroskop.
  EN FS: He is using a telescope.
  de FS: Er benutzt ein Teleskop.
  EN TP: a leaf under a microscope
  de TP: ein Blatt unter dem Mikroskop
  EN FP: a bug under a microscope
  de FP: ein Käfer unter dem Mikroskop
477 | microwave (noun): a small box that heats food very fast | loc: Mikrowelle
  EN TS: Microwave TV is the best show.
  de TS: Mikrowellen-TV ist die beste Sendung.
  EN FS: Oven TV is the best show.
  de FS: Backofen-TV ist die beste Sendung.
  EN TP: watching the microwave
  de TP: der Mikrowelle zuschauen
  EN FP: cleaning the microwave
  de FP: die Mikrowelle putzen
478 | milk (noun): the white drink that comes from cows | loc: Milch
  EN TS: Everyone has a milk moustache!
  de TS: Alle haben einen Milchbart!
  EN FS: Nobody has a milk moustache!
  de FS: Keiner hat einen Milchbart!
  EN TP: a milk moustache
  de TP: ein Milchbart
  EN FP: milk in the fridge
  de FP: Milch im Kühlschrank
479 | mind (noun): the part of you that thinks and plans | loc: Verstand
  EN TS: Her mind is two moves ahead.
  de TS: Ihr Verstand ist zwei Züge voraus.
  EN FS: Her mind is two moves behind.
  de FS: Ihr Verstand ist zwei Züge zurück.
  EN TP: planning moves in her mind
  de TP: Züge mit dem Verstand planen
  EN FP: changing her mind
  de FP: ihre Meinung ändern
480 | mineral water (noun): bottled drink from a natural spring, often fizzy | loc: Mineralwasser
  EN TS: The mineral water tickles her.
  de TS: Das Mineralwasser kitzelt sie.
  EN FS: The orange juice tickles her.
  de FS: Der Orangensaft kitzelt sie.
  EN TP: fizzy mineral water
  de TP: sprudelndes Mineralwasser
  EN FP: still mineral water
  de FP: stilles Mineralwasser
481 | mirror (noun): a piece of glass where you see yourself | loc: Spiegel
  EN TS: The mirror loves him back.
  de TS: Der Spiegel liebt ihn zurück.
  EN FS: The window loves him back.
  de FS: Das Fenster liebt ihn zurück.
  EN TP: flexing at the mirror
  de TP: vor dem Spiegel posen
  EN FP: cleaning the mirror
  de FP: den Spiegel putzen
483 | monkey (noun): a clever animal with a long tail that climbs trees | loc: Affe
  EN TS: The monkey stole a banana!
  de TS: Der Affe hat eine Banane geklaut!
  EN FS: The monkey stole a hat!
  de FS: Der Affe hat einen Hut geklaut!
  EN TP: a monkey eating a banana
  de TP: ein Affe isst eine Banane
  EN FP: a monkey selling a banana
  de FP: ein Affe verkauft eine Banane
484 | mop (noun): a stick with soft strings to wash floors | loc: Mopp
  EN TS: She is mopping the floor.
  de TS: Sie wischt mit dem Mopp den Boden.
  EN FS: She is sweeping the floor.
  de FS: Sie fegt mit dem Besen den Boden.
  EN TP: a mop in a bucket
  de TP: ein Mopp im Eimer
  EN FP: a mop of curly hair
  de FP: eine Mähne aus Locken
485 | moss (noun): a soft green plant that carpets rocks and trees | loc: Moos
  EN TS: The moss is soft. Nice pillow.
  de TS: Das Moos ist weich. Gutes Kissen.
  EN FS: The hay is soft. Nice pillow.
  de FS: Das Heu ist weich. Gutes Kissen.
  EN TP: soft green moss
  de TP: weiches grünes Moos
  EN FP: moss on a roof
  de FP: Moos auf dem Dach
486 | mountain (noun): a very high hill | loc: Berg
  EN TS: Top of the mountain, yes!
  de TS: Oben auf dem Berg, ja!
  EN FS: Bottom of the mountain, yes!
  de FS: Unten am Berg, ja!
  EN TP: on top of a mountain
  de TP: oben auf einem Berg
  EN FP: a mountain lake
  de FP: ein Bergsee
487 | mouse (noun): a small furry animal with a long tail | loc: Maus
  EN TS: The mouse found the cheese.
  de TS: Die Maus hat den Käse gefunden.
  EN FS: The mouse found the bread.
  de FS: Die Maus hat das Brot gefunden.
  EN TP: a mouse in a barn
  de TP: eine Maus in der Scheune
  EN FP: a mouse and a keyboard
  de FP: Maus und Tastatur
488 | muscle (noun): a body part that makes you move and gives strength | loc: Muskel
  EN TS: His muscles are enormous!
  de TS: Seine Muskeln sind riesig!
  EN FS: His shoes are enormous!
  de FS: Seine Schuhe sind riesig!
  EN TP: flexing big muscles
  de TP: dicke Muskeln zeigen
  EN FP: a muscle in the leg
  de FP: ein Muskel im Bein
489 | mushroom (noun): a fungus with a round cap on a short stem | loc: Pilz
  EN TS: The mushroom has white spots.
  de TS: Der Pilz hat weiße Punkte.
  EN FS: The mushroom has black spots.
  de FS: Der Pilz hat schwarze Punkte.
  EN TP: a red mushroom with spots
  de TP: ein roter Pilz mit Punkten
  EN FP: a red mushroom soup
  de FP: eine rote Pilzsuppe
490 | musician (noun): a person who plays an instrument or sings | loc: Musiker
  EN TS: This musician will be famous.
  de TS: Dieser Musiker wird berühmt.
  EN FS: This dancer will be famous.
  de FS: Dieser Tänzer wird berühmt.
  EN TP: a street musician
  de TP: ein Straßenmusiker
  EN FP: a musician in a band
  de FP: ein Musiker in einer Band
491 | mustard (noun): a yellow spicy sauce you put on hot dogs | loc: Senf
  EN TS: The mustard is sharp.
  de TS: Der Senf ist scharf.
  EN FS: The honey is sharp.
  de FS: Der Honig ist scharf.
  EN TP: a spoonful of mustard
  de TP: ein Löffel Senf
  EN FP: a jar of mustard seeds
  de FP: ein Glas Senfkörner
492 | nail polish (noun): coloured paint for your fingernails | loc: Nagellack
  EN TS: Her nail polish is still wet!
  de TS: Ihr Nagellack ist noch nass!
  EN FS: Her hair is still wet!
  de FS: Ihre Haare sind noch nass!
  EN TP: painting nails with polish
  de TP: Nägel mit Nagellack lackieren
  EN FP: removing old nail polish
  de FP: alten Nagellack entfernen
495 | nature (noun): the world of plants, water and mountains | loc: Natur
  EN TS: They are relaxing in nature.
  de TS: Sie entspannen in der Natur.
  EN FS: They are running in nature.
  de FS: Sie rennen in der Natur.
  EN TP: lying in nature
  de TP: in der Natur liegen
  EN FP: a nature film
  de FP: ein Naturfilm
496 | necklace (noun): a chain or string of beads worn around your neck | loc: Halskette
  EN TS: Nice necklace, great choice.
  de TS: Schöne Halskette, gute Wahl.
  EN FS: Nice bracelet, great choice.
  de FS: Schönes Armband, gute Wahl.
  EN TP: a colourful beaded necklace
  de TP: eine bunte Perlen-Halskette
  EN FP: a gold chain necklace
  de FP: eine goldene Halskette
498 | nervous (adjective): worried and a bit scared about what will happen | loc: nervös
  EN TS: So nervous before the show!
  de TS: So nervös vor der Show!
  EN FS: So nervous before the exam!
  de FS: So nervös vor der Prüfung!
  EN TP: a nervous guitar player
  de TP: ein nervöser Gitarrist
  EN FP: a nervous student before exams
  de FP: ein nervöser Schüler vor Prüfungen
499 | newspaper (noun): printed pages of news that come out daily | loc: Zeitung
  EN TS: Peek-a-boo with a newspaper!
  de TS: Kuckuck mit der Zeitung!
  EN FS: Peek-a-boo with a menu!
  de FS: Kuckuck mit der Speisekarte!
  EN TP: hiding behind a newspaper
  de TP: sich hinter einer Zeitung verstecken
  EN FP: reading a newspaper online
  de FP: Zeitung online lesen
500 | dribble (verb): to run with the ball at your feet past players | loc: dribbeln
  EN TS: He's dribbling past him like he's not there.
  de TS: Er dribbelt an ihm vorbei, als wäre er nicht da.
  EN FS: He's dribbling past three men like they're not there.
  de FS: Er dribbelt an drei Leuten vorbei, als wären sie nicht da.
  EN TP: dribbling past a defender
  de TP: an einem Verteidiger vorbeidribbeln
  EN FP: dribbling past the goalkeeper
  de FP: am Torwart vorbeidribbeln
501 | night (noun): the dark time between evening and morning | loc: Nacht
  EN TS: They are walking at night.
  de TS: Sie gehen in der Nacht spazieren.
  EN FS: They are walking at noon.
  de FS: Sie gehen am Mittag spazieren.
  EN TP: walking home at night
  de TP: in der Nacht nach Hause gehen
  EN FP: working at night
  de FP: in der Nacht arbeiten
502 | north (noun): the direction toward the top of a map | loc: Norden
  EN TS: They are heading north.
  de TS: Sie gehen Richtung Norden.
  EN FS: They are heading south.
  de FS: Sie gehen Richtung Süden.
  EN TP: heading north with a compass
  de TP: mit Kompass nach Norden
  EN FP: the north of a city
  de FP: der Norden einer Stadt
503 | notebook (noun): a book with empty pages for writing in | loc: Notizbuch
  EN TS: A new notebook! Big moment.
  de TS: Ein neues Notizbuch! Großer Moment.
  EN FS: A new laptop! Big moment.
  de FS: Ein neuer Laptop! Großer Moment.
  EN TP: a brand-new notebook
  de TP: ein nagelneues Notizbuch
  EN FP: a notebook full of notes
  de FP: ein Notizbuch voller Notizen
505 | nut (noun): a dry fruit with a hard shell and a seed inside | loc: Nuss | translator note: English FP pun (nut on a bolt) does not travel
  EN TS: He is fighting a tiny nut.
  de TS: Er kämpft gegen eine winzige Nuss.
  EN FS: He is fighting a tiny egg.
  de FS: Er kämpft gegen ein winziges Ei.
  EN TP: cracking a nut
  de TP: eine Nuss knacken
  EN FP: a nut on a bolt
  de FP: eine Nuss in Schokolade
506 | nutrition (noun): healthy food and what it gives your body | loc: Ernährung
  EN TS: Their plate is pure nutrition.
  de TS: Ihr Teller: reine gesunde Ernährung.
  EN FS: Their plate is pure sugar.
  de FS: Ihr Teller: reiner Zucker.
  EN TP: a plate full of nutrition
  de TP: ein Teller voll gesunder Ernährung
  EN FP: nutrition facts on a box
  de FP: Nährwertangaben auf einer Packung
507 | observe (verb): to watch something carefully to learn | loc: beobachten
  EN TS: She is observing a dragonfly.
  de TS: Sie beobachtet eine Libelle.
  EN FS: She is observing a butterfly.
  de FS: Sie beobachtet einen Schmetterling.
  EN TP: observing a dragonfly
  de TP: eine Libelle beobachten
  EN FP: catching a dragonfly
  de FP: eine Libelle fangen
508 | ocean (noun): the huge salt water that covers most of the earth | loc: Ozean
  EN TS: Dolphins in the ocean! No way!
  de TS: Delfine im Ozean! Echt jetzt?
  EN FS: Sharks in the ocean! No way!
  de FS: Haie im Ozean! Echt jetzt?
  EN TP: dolphins in the ocean
  de TP: Delfine im Ozean
  EN FP: swimming in the ocean
  de FP: im Ozean schwimmen
509 | oil (noun): a liquid from plants that you use in cooking | loc: Öl
  EN TS: The oil is pouring slowly.
  de TS: Das Öl fließt langsam.
  EN FS: The milk is pouring slowly.
  de FS: Die Milch fließt langsam.
  EN TP: bread in olive oil
  de TP: Brot in Olivenöl
  EN FP: oil in a frying pan
  de FP: Öl in der Bratpfanne
511 | onion (noun): a round vegetable that makes your eyes water | loc: Zwiebel
  EN TS: He is cutting onions in swim goggles. Genius!
  de TS: Er schneidet Zwiebeln mit Schwimmbrille. Genial!
  EN FS: He is cutting onions in sunglasses. Genius!
  de FS: Er schneidet Zwiebeln mit Sonnenbrille. Genial!
  EN TP: chopping a white onion
  de TP: eine weiße Zwiebel hacken
  EN FP: frying a white onion
  de FP: eine weiße Zwiebel braten
512 | outfit (noun): the set of clothes worn together | loc: Outfit
  EN TS: The outfit finally works.
  de TS: Das Outfit passt endlich.
  EN FS: The haircut finally works.
  de FS: Die Frisur passt endlich.
  EN TP: putting together an outfit
  de TP: ein Outfit zusammenstellen
  EN FP: an outfit for a wedding
  de FP: ein Outfit für eine Hochzeit
513 | outside (adverb): not inside a building, out in the open air | loc: draußen
  EN TS: They are eating outside. Who needs a dining room?
  de TS: Sie essen draußen. Wer braucht schon ein Esszimmer?
  EN FS: They are eating inside. Who needs a dining room?
  de FS: Sie essen drinnen. Wer braucht schon ein Esszimmer?
  EN TP: eating outside on the grass
  de TP: draußen im Gras essen
  EN FP: eating outside at a cafe
  de FP: draußen im Café essen
514 | oven (noun): a hot box in a kitchen for baking and roasting | loc: Backofen
  EN TS: The oven is their new TV.
  de TS: Der Backofen ist ihr neuer Fernseher.
  EN FS: The fridge is their new TV.
  de FS: Der Kühlschrank ist ihr neuer Fernseher.
  EN TP: bread rising in the oven
  de TP: Brot geht im Backofen auf
  EN FP: pizza in the oven
  de FP: Pizza im Backofen
515 | overcome (verb): to succeed against something that holds you back | loc: überwinden
  EN TS: She overcame the wall!
  de TS: Sie hat die Wand überwunden!
  EN FS: She overcame the river!
  de FS: Sie hat den Fluss überwunden!
  EN TP: overcoming a climbing wall
  de TP: eine Kletterwand überwinden
  EN FP: overcoming a fear of dogs
  de FP: die Angst vor Hunden überwinden
516 | overflow (verb): when liquid rises over the edge and spills out | loc: überlaufen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The sink overflowed. Oops.
  de TS: Das Waschbecken ist übergelaufen. Ups.
  EN FS: The bath overflowed. Oops.
  de FS: Die Badewanne ist übergelaufen. Ups.
  EN TP: an overflowing sink
  de TP: ein überlaufendes Waschbecken
  EN FP: an overflowing bin
  de FP: ein überlaufender Mülleimer
517 | overtake (verb): to pass a slower vehicle and get ahead | loc: überholen
  EN TS: Bye, camper! He's overtaking!
  de TS: Tschüss, Camper! Er überholt!
  EN FS: Bye, camper! He's parking!
  de FS: Tschüss, Camper! Er parkt!
  EN TP: overtaking a slow camper
  de TP: einen langsamen Camper überholen
  EN FP: overtaking a fast train
  de FP: einen schnellen Zug überholen
518 | owl (noun): a round-faced bird that hunts at night | loc: Eule
  EN TS: The owl is watching you.
  de TS: Die Eule beobachtet dich.
  EN FS: The crow is watching you.
  de FS: Die Krähe beobachtet dich.
  EN TP: an owl on a branch
  de TP: eine Eule auf einem Ast
  EN FP: an owl in a cage
  de FP: eine Eule im Käfig
519 | pack (verb): to put things into a bag or box to take along | loc: packen
  EN TS: The bag is packed for school.
  de TS: Die Tasche ist für die Schule gepackt.
  EN FS: The bag is packed for a trip.
  de FS: Die Tasche ist für eine Reise gepackt.
  EN TP: packing a school bag
  de TP: eine Schultasche packen
  EN FP: packing a suitcase
  de FP: einen Koffer packen
520 | paddle (verb): to move a boat by pulling a flat oar | loc: paddeln
  EN TS: She's paddling, he's sleeping.
  de TS: Sie paddelt, er schläft.
  EN FS: She's paddling, he's fishing.
  de FS: Sie paddelt, er angelt.
  EN TP: paddling a canoe
  de TP: mit dem Kanu paddeln
  EN FP: paddling a surfboard
  de FP: auf dem Surfbrett paddeln
521 | pain (noun): the feeling you have when your body is hurt | loc: Schmerz
  EN TS: His toe is in serious pain!
  de TS: Sein Zeh: höllische Schmerzen!
  EN FS: His hand is in serious pain!
  de FS: Seine Hand: höllische Schmerzen!
  EN TP: pain in the toe
  de TP: Schmerzen im Zeh
  EN FP: pain in the back
  de FP: Schmerzen im Rücken
522 | painting (noun): making a picture with a brush and colours | loc: Gemälde
  EN TS: Her painting is better than the real view, she says.
  de TS: Ihr Gemälde ist schöner als die echte Aussicht, sagt sie.
  EN FS: Her painting is worse than the real view, she says.
  de FS: Ihr Gemälde ist schlechter als die echte Aussicht, sagt sie.
  EN TP: painting the sea
  de TP: ein Gemälde vom Meer
  EN FP: painting a wall white
  de FP: eine Wand weiß streichen
523 | pan (noun): a flat metal pot with a handle for frying | loc: Pfanne
  EN TS: Nice moves with that frying pan!
  de TS: Coole Moves mit der Pfanne!
  EN FS: Nice moves with that pizza dough!
  de FS: Coole Moves mit dem Pizzateig!
  EN TP: vegetables in a frying pan
  de TP: Gemüse in der Pfanne
  EN FP: pancakes in a frying pan
  de FP: Pfannkuchen in der Pfanne
524 | panic (noun): a sudden strong fear that stops you acting calmly | loc: Panik
  EN TS: Panic mode: the train left without her!
  de TS: Panikmodus: Der Zug ist ohne sie abgefahren!
  EN FS: Panic mode: the bus left without her!
  de FS: Panikmodus: Der Bus ist ohne sie abgefahren!
  EN TP: panic on the platform
  de TP: Panik am Bahnsteig
  EN FP: panic on the plane
  de FP: Panik im Flugzeug
525 | paperclip (noun): a bent wire that holds sheets together | loc: Büroklammer
  EN TS: One little paperclip is beating the big fan.
  de TS: Eine kleine Büroklammer besiegt den großen Ventilator.
  EN FS: One little stapler is beating the big fan.
  de FS: Ein kleiner Tacker besiegt den großen Ventilator.
  EN TP: a paperclip on the papers
  de TP: eine Büroklammer an den Blättern
  EN FP: a paperclip holding a photo
  de FP: eine Büroklammer hält ein Foto
526 | paralyze (verb): to make someone unable to move at all | loc: lähmen
  EN TS: The ray gun paralyzed him!
  de TS: Die Strahlenkanone hat ihn gelähmt!
  EN FS: The water gun paralyzed him!
  de FS: Die Wasserpistole hat ihn gelähmt!
  EN TP: paralyzed by a ray gun
  de TP: von einer Strahlenkanone gelähmt
  EN FP: paralyzed by fear
  de FP: vor Angst gelähmt
527 | parcel (noun): a box or package sent by post | loc: Paket
  EN TS: She got a parcel!
  de TS: Sie hat ein Paket bekommen!
  EN FS: She got a letter!
  de FS: Sie hat einen Brief bekommen!
  EN TP: opening a parcel
  de TP: ein Paket öffnen
  EN FP: sending a parcel
  de FP: ein Paket verschicken
528 | park (verb): to stop a car and leave it in a place | loc: parken
  EN TS: She is parking like a pro!
  de TS: Sie parkt wie ein Profi!
  EN FS: He is parking like a pro!
  de FS: Er parkt wie ein Profi!
  EN TP: to park between two cars
  de TP: zwischen zwei Autos parken
  EN FP: to park in a garage
  de FP: in einer Garage parken
530 | parrot (noun): a bright tropical bird with a curved beak | loc: Papagei
  EN TS: The parrot is saying hello.
  de TS: Der Papagei sagt Hallo.
  EN FS: The parrot is saying goodbye.
  de FS: Der Papagei sagt Tschüss.
  EN TP: a parrot on a railing
  de TP: ein Papagei auf einem Geländer
  EN FP: a parrot in a cage
  de FP: ein Papagei im Käfig
531 | party (noun): a get-together where people eat, drink and dance | loc: Party
  EN TS: This garden party is lit.
  de TS: Diese Gartenparty ist der Hammer.
  EN FS: This pool party is lit.
  de FS: Diese Poolparty ist der Hammer.
  EN TP: a garden party at sunset
  de TP: eine Gartenparty bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a pool party
  de FP: eine Poolparty
532 | pass (verb): to kick or throw a ball to someone on your team | loc: abspielen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He passed, she scored, easy.
  de TS: Er spielt ab, sie trifft, easy.
  EN FS: She passed, he scored, easy.
  de FS: Sie spielt ab, er trifft, easy.
  EN TP: passing the ball to her
  de TP: den Ball zu ihr abspielen
  EN FP: passing a slow car
  de FP: ein langsames Auto überholen
533 | passport (noun): an official book you show when you travel abroad | loc: Reisepass
  EN TS: She kissed her passport!
  de TS: Sie hat ihren Reisepass geküsst!
  EN FS: She kissed her suitcase!
  de FS: Sie hat ihren Koffer geküsst!
  EN TP: a stamped passport
  de TP: ein Reisepass mit Stempeln
  EN FP: a passport photo booth
  de FP: ein Passbildautomat
535 | pasta (noun): an Italian food made from flour, water and eggs | loc: Pasta
  EN TS: The pasta tower looks professional.
  de TS: Der Pasta-Turm sieht professionell aus.
  EN FS: The cake tower looks professional.
  de FS: Der Tortenturm sieht professionell aus.
  EN TP: a tower of pasta
  de TP: ein Turm aus Pasta
  EN FP: pasta in a salad
  de FP: Pasta im Salat
536 | peace (noun): a calm, quiet feeling with no stress | loc: Ruhe
  EN TS: She finds peace in a hammock.
  de TS: Sie findet Ruhe in einer Hängematte.
  EN FS: She finds peace in a bathtub.
  de FS: Sie findet Ruhe in einer Badewanne.
  EN TP: peace at sunrise
  de TP: Ruhe bei Sonnenaufgang
  EN FP: peace at midnight
  de FP: Ruhe um Mitternacht
537 | peel (verb): to take the skin off fruit or vegetables | loc: schälen
  EN TS: She is peeling a red apple.
  de TS: Sie schält einen roten Apfel.
  EN FS: She is peeling a green apple.
  de FS: Sie schält einen grünen Apfel.
  EN TP: to peel in one spiral
  de TP: in einer Spirale schälen
  EN FP: to peel a banana
  de FP: eine Banane schälen
538 | pen (noun): a thin tool you write with in ink | loc: Kugelschreiber
  EN TS: His pen has many colours.
  de TS: Sein Kugelschreiber hat viele Farben.
  EN FS: His pen has one colour.
  de FS: Sein Kugelschreiber hat nur eine Farbe.
  EN TP: a pen with many colours
  de TP: ein Kugelschreiber mit vielen Farben
  EN FP: a pen with a light
  de FP: ein Kugelschreiber mit Licht
540 | penalty (noun): a free kick at goal given after a foul | loc: Elfmeter
  EN TS: She scored the penalty!
  de TS: Sie hat den Elfmeter verwandelt!
  EN FS: She missed the penalty!
  de FS: Sie hat den Elfmeter verschossen!
  EN TP: scoring a penalty
  de TP: einen Elfmeter verwandeln
  EN FP: saving a penalty
  de FP: einen Elfmeter halten
541 | pencil (noun): a thin wooden tool you write or draw with | loc: Bleistift
  EN TS: Her pencil drawing is so good.
  de TS: Ihre Bleistiftzeichnung ist so gut.
  EN FS: Her pen drawing is so good.
  de FS: Ihre Kugelschreiberzeichnung ist so gut.
  EN TP: drawing with a yellow pencil
  de TP: mit einem gelben Bleistift zeichnen
  EN FP: sharpening a yellow pencil
  de FP: einen gelben Bleistift spitzen
542 | penguin (noun): a black and white bird that swims but cannot fly | loc: Pinguin
  EN TS: Belly slide! Go, penguin!
  de TS: Bauchrutscher! Los, Pinguin!
  EN FS: Belly slide! Go, seal!
  de FS: Bauchrutscher! Los, Robbe!
  EN TP: a penguin on the ice
  de TP: ein Pinguin auf dem Eis
  EN FP: a penguin in a zoo
  de FP: ein Pinguin im Zoo
543 | pepper (noun): a hot-tasting powder from ground black seeds | loc: Pfeffer
  EN TS: The pepper made him sneeze!
  de TS: Der Pfeffer hat ihn zum Niesen gebracht!
  EN FS: The onion made him sneeze!
  de FS: Die Zwiebel hat ihn zum Niesen gebracht!
  EN TP: grinding black pepper
  de TP: schwarzen Pfeffer mahlen
  EN FP: grinding coffee beans
  de FP: Kaffeebohnen mahlen
545 | performance (noun): a show performed in front of an audience | loc: Auftritt
  EN TS: What a juggling performance!
  de TS: Was für ein Jonglier-Auftritt!
  EN FS: What a dance performance!
  de FS: Was für ein Tanz-Auftritt!
  EN TP: a street juggling performance
  de TP: ein Jonglier-Auftritt auf der Straße
  EN FP: a school exam performance
  de FP: eine Prüfungsleistung in der Schule
546 | perfume (noun): a liquid with a nice smell you put on your skin | loc: Parfüm
  EN TS: That is way too much perfume!
  de TS: Das ist viel zu viel Parfüm!
  EN FS: That is way too much water!
  de FS: Das ist viel zu viel Wasser!
  EN TP: spraying perfume on a friend
  de TP: Parfüm auf eine Freundin sprühen
  EN FP: spraying perfume on a dress
  de FP: Parfüm auf ein Kleid sprühen
547 | phone (noun): a device you use to call and talk to people | loc: Handy
  EN TS: Her phone is ringing!
  de TS: Ihr Handy klingelt!
  EN FS: Her doorbell is ringing!
  de FS: Ihre Türklingel klingelt!
  EN TP: answering the phone
  de TP: ans Handy gehen
  EN FP: a phone in a pocket
  de FP: ein Handy in der Tasche
548 | photography (noun): the activity of taking pictures with a camera | loc: Fotografie
  EN TS: That one! Photography is fun.
  de TS: Das da! Fotografie macht Spaß.
  EN FS: That one! Painting is fun.
  de FS: Das da! Malen macht Spaß.
  EN TP: street photography at sunset
  de TP: Straßenfotografie bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: wedding photography indoors
  de FP: Hochzeitsfotografie drinnen
549 | piercing (noun): a small hole in the ear for wearing jewelry | loc: Piercing
  EN TS: A gold hoop for her piercing.
  de TS: Eine goldene Creole für ihr Piercing.
  EN FS: A gold stud for her piercing.
  de FS: Ein goldener Stecker für ihr Piercing.
  EN TP: a gold hoop piercing
  de TP: ein Piercing mit goldener Creole
  EN FP: a piercing in her nose
  de FP: ein Piercing in der Nase
550 | pig (noun): a pink farm animal with a flat nose and short legs | loc: Schwein
  EN TS: The pig is rolling in the mud.
  de TS: Das Schwein wälzt sich im Schlamm.
  EN FS: The pig is rolling in snow.
  de FS: Das Schwein wälzt sich im Schnee.
  EN TP: a pig in a farmyard
  de TP: ein Schwein auf dem Hof
  EN FP: a pig in a bathtub
  de FP: ein Schwein in der Badewanne
551 | pigeon (noun): a grey city bird that walks and pecks at crumbs | loc: Taube
  EN TS: The pigeon is inspecting the cafe.
  de TS: Die Taube inspiziert das Café.
  EN FS: The pigeon is inspecting the bank.
  de FS: Die Taube inspiziert die Bank.
  EN TP: a pigeon on a square
  de TP: eine Taube auf einem Platz
  EN FP: a pigeon in a park
  de FP: eine Taube im Park
553 | pitch (noun): the grass field where football is played | loc: Spielfeld
  EN TS: He is so proud of his pitch.
  de TS: Er ist so stolz auf sein Spielfeld.
  EN FS: He is so proud of his car.
  de FS: Er ist so stolz auf sein Auto.
  EN TP: mowing the pitch
  de TP: das Spielfeld mähen
  EN FP: painting the pitch
  de FP: das Spielfeld anstreichen
554 | place (noun): a spot or area where you can be | loc: Platz
  EN TS: Perfect place on the beach.
  de TS: Perfekter Platz am Strand.
  EN FS: Perfect place in the park.
  de FS: Perfekter Platz im Park.
  EN TP: the perfect place to sit
  de TP: der perfekte Platz zum Sitzen
  EN FP: a place in the queue
  de FP: ein Platz in der Schlange
555 | plant (noun): a living green thing that grows in soil | loc: Pflanze
  EN TS: The plant has a new leaf!
  de TS: Die Pflanze hat ein neues Blatt!
  EN FS: The plant has a new flower!
  de FS: Die Pflanze hat eine neue Blüte!
  EN TP: a plant with big leaves
  de TP: eine Pflanze mit großen Blättern
  EN FP: a plant with red flowers
  de FP: eine Pflanze mit roten Blüten
556 | plaster (noun): a small sticky strip that covers a cut | loc: Pflaster | translator note: FP pun moved to Straßenpflaster (plaster on a wall does not work in German)
  EN TS: He saved her life with a plaster.
  de TS: Er hat ihr mit einem Pflaster das Leben gerettet.
  EN FS: He saved her life with some ice.
  de FS: Er hat ihr mit etwas Eis das Leben gerettet.
  EN TP: a plaster on a fingertip
  de TP: ein Pflaster auf der Fingerkuppe
  EN FP: plaster on a wall
  de FP: Pflaster auf der Straße
557 | plate (noun): a flat round dish you eat food from | loc: Teller
  EN TS: The chef is serving the plate.
  de TS: Der Koch serviert den Teller.
  EN FS: The chef is washing the plate.
  de FS: Der Koch spült den Teller.
  EN TP: spaghetti on a white plate
  de TP: Spaghetti auf einem weißen Teller
  EN FP: a stack of empty plates
  de FP: ein Stapel leerer Teller
558 | play (verb): to take part in a game or sport | loc: spielen
  EN TS: He lost his hat playing volleyball.
  de TS: Er hat beim Volleyballspielen seinen Hut verloren.
  EN FS: He lost his shoe playing volleyball.
  de FS: Er hat beim Volleyballspielen seinen Schuh verloren.
  EN TP: playing volleyball in a park
  de TP: im Park Volleyball spielen
  EN FP: playing cards in a park
  de FP: im Park Karten spielen
559 | player (noun): a person who takes part in a game or sport | loc: Spieler
  EN TS: This player is so happy!
  de TS: Dieser Spieler ist so glücklich!
  EN FS: This player is so angry!
  de FS: Dieser Spieler ist so wütend!
  EN TP: a player in yellow
  de TP: ein Spieler in Gelb
  EN FP: a player on the bench
  de FP: ein Spieler auf der Bank
560 | fountain (noun): a structure that shoots water into the air | loc: Springbrunnen
  EN TS: Selfie first, fountain second.
  de TS: Erst das Selfie, dann der Springbrunnen.
  EN FS: Selfie first, pizza second.
  de FS: Erst das Selfie, dann die Pizza.
  EN TP: the famous Trevi Fountain
  de TP: der berühmte Trevi-Brunnen
  EN FP: a fountain in a mall
  de FP: ein Springbrunnen im Einkaufszentrum
561 | pleasure (noun): a feeling of enjoyment and delight | loc: Genuss
  EN TS: A croissant of pure pleasure.
  de TS: Ein Croissant voller Genuss.
  EN FS: A bagel of pure pleasure.
  de FS: Ein Bagel voller Genuss.
  EN TP: the pleasure of a croissant
  de TP: der Genuss eines Croissants
  EN FP: a pleasure to meet you
  de FP: ein Genuss, dich kennenzulernen
562 | plug (noun): the end of a cable you push into a socket | loc: Stecker
  EN TS: The plug was the problem.
  de TS: Der Stecker war das Problem.
  EN FS: The bulb was the problem.
  de FS: Die Glühbirne war das Problem.
  EN TP: a loose plug
  de TP: ein lockerer Stecker
  EN FP: a bath plug
  de FP: ein Badewannenstöpsel
563 | pocket (noun): a small bag sewn into clothes to keep things in | loc: Tasche
  EN TS: The keys were in his pocket!
  de TS: Die Schlüssel waren in seiner Tasche!
  EN FS: The keys were in his shoe!
  de FS: Die Schlüssel waren in seinem Schuh!
  EN TP: keys in a jacket pocket
  de TP: Schlüssel in der Jackentasche
  EN FP: keys in a car door
  de FP: Schlüssel in der Autotür
564 | podium (noun): the three-step stand where winners stand | loc: Siegertreppchen
  EN TS: Their podium is made of foam.
  de TS: Ihr Siegertreppchen ist aus Schaumstoff.
  EN FS: Their podium is made of gold.
  de FS: Ihr Siegertreppchen ist aus Gold.
  EN TP: a foam block podium
  de TP: ein Siegertreppchen aus Schaumstoff
  EN FP: a podium at a conference
  de FP: ein Podium auf einer Konferenz
565 | politics (noun): the activity of elections and governing | loc: Politik
  EN TS: In this politics game, orange won.
  de TS: In diesem Politikspiel hat Orange gewonnen.
  EN FS: In this politics game, green won.
  de FS: In diesem Politikspiel hat Grün gewonnen.
  EN TP: politics in the town square
  de TP: Politik auf dem Marktplatz
  EN FP: politics on TV
  de FP: Politik im Fernsehen
566 | pollute (verb): to make water or air dirty and harmful | loc: verschmutzen
  EN TS: He is polluting the river. Shame!
  de TS: Er verschmutzt den Fluss. Schande!
  EN FS: He is cleaning the river. Shame!
  de FS: Er säubert den Fluss. Schande!
  EN TP: to pollute a clean river
  de TP: einen sauberen Fluss verschmutzen
  EN FP: to pollute the sea
  de FP: das Meer verschmutzen
567 | pond (noun): a small area of still water | loc: Teich
  EN TS: Goldfish live in this pond.
  de TS: In diesem Teich leben Goldfische.
  EN FS: Frogs live in this pond.
  de FS: In diesem Teich leben Frösche.
  EN TP: goldfish in the pond
  de TP: Goldfische im Teich
  EN FP: ducks on the pond
  de FP: Enten auf dem Teich
568 | pool (noun): a big tank of water that you swim in | loc: Swimmingpool
  EN TS: She wanted a quiet day at the pool.
  de TS: Sie wollte einen ruhigen Tag am Swimmingpool.
  EN FS: She wanted a quiet day at the lake.
  de FS: Sie wollte einen ruhigen Tag am See.
  EN TP: splashing into the pool
  de TP: in den Swimmingpool platschen
  EN FP: a pool table
  de FP: ein Billardtisch
569 | postmaster (noun): the person in charge of a post office | loc: Postmeister
  EN TS: The postmaster is very bossy.
  de TS: Der Postmeister ist sehr herrisch.
  EN FS: The postmaster is very shy.
  de FS: Der Postmeister ist sehr schüchtern.
  EN TP: a bossy postmaster
  de TP: ein herrischer Postmeister
  EN FP: a postmaster on holiday
  de FP: ein Postmeister im Urlaub
571 | pot (noun): a deep round container for cooking | loc: Topf
  EN TS: The pot water is dancing!
  de TS: Das Wasser im Topf tanzt!
  EN FS: The pot water is freezing!
  de FS: Das Wasser im Topf gefriert!
  EN TP: potatoes in a big pot
  de TP: Kartoffeln in einem großen Topf
  EN FP: flowers in a big pot
  de FP: Blumen in einem großen Topf
572 | potato (noun): a round vegetable that grows under the ground | loc: Kartoffel
  EN TS: They found a lot of potatoes!
  de TS: Sie haben jede Menge Kartoffeln gefunden!
  EN FS: They found a lot of carrots!
  de FS: Sie haben jede Menge Karotten gefunden!
  EN TP: digging up potatoes
  de TP: Kartoffeln ausgraben
  EN FP: peeling potatoes
  de FP: Kartoffeln schälen
573 | pouring (noun): making a liquid flow out of a container | loc: Eingießen
  EN TS: His pouring shows real skill.
  de TS: Sein Eingießen zeigt echtes Können.
  EN FS: His singing shows real skill.
  de FS: Sein Singen zeigt echtes Können.
  EN TP: pouring from up high
  de TP: Eingießen aus großer Höhe
  EN FP: pouring rain outside
  de FP: strömender Regen draußen
574 | powder (noun): a very fine dry dust, like flour or makeup | loc: Puder
  EN TS: What a cloud of powder!
  de TS: Was für eine Wolke aus Puder!
  EN FS: What a cloud of smoke!
  de FS: Was für eine Wolke aus Rauch!
  EN TP: brushing on face powder
  de TP: Puder aufs Gesicht pinseln
  EN FP: baking with white powder
  de FP: Puderzucker auf einem Kuchen
575 | power bank (noun): a portable battery you carry to charge your phone | loc: Powerbank
  EN TS: Her power bank saved the day!
  de TS: Ihre Powerbank hat den Tag gerettet!
  EN FS: His power bank saved the day!
  de FS: Seine Powerbank hat den Tag gerettet!
  EN TP: charging from a power bank
  de TP: an einer Powerbank laden
  EN FP: a power bank at home
  de FP: eine Powerbank zu Hause
576 | pray (verb): to speak to a god | loc: beten
  EN TS: She prays for a good grade.
  de TS: Sie betet für eine gute Note.
  EN FS: She prays for a new phone.
  de FS: Sie betet für ein neues Handy.
  EN TP: praying for a good grade
  de TP: für eine gute Note beten
  EN FP: praying in a church
  de FP: in einer Kirche beten
577 | predict (verb): to say what will happen before it happens | loc: vorhersagen
  EN TS: She predicted the rain. He didn't.
  de TS: Sie hat den Regen vorhergesagt. Er nicht.
  EN FS: She predicted the snow. He didn't.
  de FS: Sie hat den Schnee vorhergesagt. Er nicht.
  EN TP: predicting the rain
  de TP: den Regen vorhersagen
  EN FP: predicting the lottery numbers
  de FP: die Lottozahlen vorhersagen
578 | pride (noun): the good feeling about something you did well | loc: Stolz
  EN TS: She is beaming with pride.
  de TS: Sie strahlt vor Stolz.
  EN FS: She is crying with pride.
  de FS: Sie weint vor Stolz.
  EN TP: pride in her motorbike
  de TP: Stolz auf ihr Motorrad
  EN FP: pride in her new car
  de FP: Stolz auf ihr neues Auto
579 | programming (noun): writing code that tells a computer what to do | loc: Programmieren
  EN TS: Programming a robot is hard.
  de TS: Einen Roboter zu programmieren ist schwer.
  EN FS: Programming a drone is hard.
  de FS: Eine Drohne zu programmieren ist schwer.
  EN TP: programming a small robot
  de TP: einen kleinen Roboter programmieren
  EN FP: programming a video game
  de FP: ein Videospiel programmieren
580 | protect (verb): to keep someone or something safe from harm | loc: schützen
  EN TS: She is protecting her from the rain.
  de TS: Sie schützt sie vor dem Regen.
  EN FS: She is protecting her from the sun.
  de FS: Sie schützt sie vor der Sonne.
  EN TP: protecting someone from rain
  de TP: jemanden vor Regen schützen
  EN FP: protecting someone from a dog
  de FP: jemanden vor einem Hund schützen
581 | protesting (noun): marching with signs to demand a change | loc: protestieren
  EN TS: Protesting with sunflowers!
  de TS: Protestieren mit Sonnenblumen!
  EN FS: Protesting with umbrellas!
  de FS: Protestieren mit Regenschirmen!
  EN TP: protesting for nature
  de TP: für die Natur protestieren
  EN FP: protesting in the rain
  de FP: im Regen protestieren
582 | proud (adjective): pleased and happy about something you did | loc: stolz
  EN TS: She is proud of her chair.
  de TS: Sie ist stolz auf ihren Stuhl.
  EN FS: She is proud of her table.
  de FS: Sie ist stolz auf ihren Tisch.
  EN TP: proud of her work
  de TP: stolz auf ihre Arbeit
  EN FP: proud of her car
  de FP: stolz auf ihr Auto
584 | prove (verb): to show that something is true by demonstrating it | loc: beweisen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She proved him wrong. Easy.
  de TS: Sie hat ihm bewiesen, dass er falschliegt. Easy.
  EN FS: He proved her wrong. Easy.
  de FS: Er hat ihr bewiesen, dass sie falschliegt. Easy.
  EN TP: proving him wrong
  de TP: beweisen, dass er falschliegt
  EN FP: proving her wrong
  de FP: beweisen, dass sie falschliegt
585 | public (adjective): open to everyone, not private | loc: öffentlich
  EN TS: She is playing music in public.
  de TS: Sie spielt öffentlich Musik.
  EN FS: She is playing chess in public.
  de FS: Sie spielt öffentlich Schach.
  EN TP: playing music in public
  de TP: öffentlich Musik machen
  EN FP: a public swimming pool
  de FP: ein öffentliches Schwimmbad
587 | puck (noun): the hard black disc used in ice hockey | loc: Puck
  EN TS: Yellow scored with the puck!
  de TS: Gelb hat mit dem Puck getroffen!
  EN FS: Purple scored with the puck!
  de FS: Lila hat mit dem Puck getroffen!
  EN TP: a puck in the net
  de TP: ein Puck im Netz
  EN FP: a puck in the stands
  de FP: ein Puck auf der Tribüne
588 | puddle (noun): a small pool of rain water on the ground | loc: Pfütze
  EN TS: Splash! A big puddle jump.
  de TS: Platsch! Ein großer Pfützensprung.
  EN FS: Splash! A big pool jump.
  de FS: Platsch! Ein großer Poolsprung.
  EN TP: jumping into a puddle
  de TP: in eine Pfütze springen
  EN FP: stepping around a puddle
  de FP: um eine Pfütze herumgehen
589 | pulling (noun): the act of moving something toward you with force | loc: Ziehen
  EN TS: Hard pulling, happy ending.
  de TS: Hartes Ziehen, Happy End.
  EN FS: Hard pushing, happy ending.
  de FS: Hartes Schieben, Happy End.
  EN TP: pulling on a thick rope
  de TP: an einem dicken Seil ziehen
  EN FP: pulling a door open
  de FP: eine Tür aufziehen
590 | punch (verb): to hit something hard with your fist | loc: schlagen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is punching like a pro!
  de TS: Sie schlägt zu wie ein Profi!
  EN FS: She is kicking like a pro!
  de FS: Sie tritt zu wie ein Profi!
  EN TP: punching the focus pads
  de TP: auf die Pratzen schlagen
  EN FP: punching the wall
  de FP: gegen die Wand schlagen
591 | punching bag (noun): a heavy hanging bag that boxers hit | loc: Boxsack
  EN TS: He's in love with his punching bag.
  de TS: Er ist verliebt in seinen Boxsack.
  EN FS: He's in love with his garage ladder.
  de FS: Er ist verliebt in seine Garagenleiter.
  EN TP: hanging a punching bag
  de TP: einen Boxsack aufhängen
  EN FP: punching the garage door
  de FP: gegen das Garagentor schlagen
592 | pushing (noun): the act of moving something away from you | loc: Schieben
  EN TS: Pushing a van? Easy!
  de TS: Einen Transporter schieben? Easy!
  EN FS: Pushing a bus? Easy!
  de FS: Einen Bus schieben? Easy!
  EN TP: pushing a white van
  de TP: einen weißen Transporter schieben
  EN FP: pushing a white car
  de FP: ein weißes Auto schieben
593 | pyjamas (noun): loose soft clothes you wear in bed | loc: Schlafanzug
  EN TS: Matching pyjamas? So cute!
  de TS: Schlafanzüge im Partnerlook? So süß!
  EN FS: Matching jackets? So cute!
  de FS: Jacken im Partnerlook? So süß!
  EN TP: matching checked pyjamas
  de TP: karierte Partnerlook-Schlafanzüge
  EN FP: matching striped pyjamas
  de FP: gestreifte Partnerlook-Schlafanzüge
594 | qualify (verb): to reach the standard to go through | loc: sich qualifizieren
  EN TS: The jump qualified her.
  de TS: Mit dem Sprung hat sie sich qualifiziert.
  EN FS: The swim qualified her.
  de FS: Mit dem Schwimmen hat sie sich qualifiziert.
  EN TP: qualifying for the next round
  de TP: sich für die nächste Runde qualifizieren
  EN FP: qualifying as a doctor
  de FP: sich als Ärztin qualifizieren
595 | rabbit (noun): a small animal with long ears and a fluffy tail | loc: Kaninchen
  EN TS: The rabbit is sitting up.
  de TS: Das Kaninchen sitzt aufrecht.
  EN FS: The rabbit is lying down.
  de FS: Das Kaninchen liegt flach.
  EN TP: a rabbit in the dunes
  de TP: ein Kaninchen in den Dünen
  EN FP: a rabbit in a hat
  de FP: ein Kaninchen im Hut
596 | race (noun): a contest to see who is fastest | loc: Rennen
  EN TS: Go, go, go! What a race!
  de TS: Los, los, los! Was für ein Rennen!
  EN FS: Go, go, go! What a swim!
  de FS: Los, los, los! Was für ein Wettschwimmen!
  EN TP: a race on a track
  de TP: ein Rennen auf der Bahn
  EN FP: a race in a pool
  de FP: ein Rennen im Pool
597 | racket (noun): a bat with strings for hitting a ball | loc: Schläger
  EN TS: Cool trick with the racket.
  de TS: Cooler Trick mit dem Schläger.
  EN FS: Cool trick with the bottle.
  de FS: Cooler Trick mit der Flasche.
  EN TP: a black tennis racket
  de TP: ein schwarzer Tennisschläger
  EN FP: a racket for badminton
  de FP: ein Badmintonschläger
598 | rain (noun): water that falls from clouds in drops | loc: Regen
  EN TS: She is dancing in the rain.
  de TS: Sie tanzt im Regen.
  EN FS: She is dancing in the snow.
  de FS: Sie tanzt im Schnee.
  EN TP: dancing in heavy rain
  de TP: im Starkregen tanzen
  EN FP: hiding from the rain
  de FP: sich vor dem Regen verstecken
599 | rapid (adjective): very fast; happening at great speed | loc: rasant
  EN TS: These moves are super rapid.
  de TS: Diese Moves sind mega rasant.
  EN FS: These moves are super slow.
  de FS: Diese Moves sind mega langsam.
  EN TP: rapid stepovers
  de TP: rasante Übersteiger
  EN FP: rapid passes
  de FP: rasante Pässe
600 | rat (noun): an animal like a big mouse with a long tail | loc: Ratte
  EN TS: The rat is stealing pizza!
  de TS: Die Ratte klaut Pizza!
  EN FS: The rat is stealing bread!
  de FS: Die Ratte klaut Brot!
  EN TP: a rat with pizza
  de TP: eine Ratte mit Pizza
  EN FP: a rat in a cage
  de FP: eine Ratte im Käfig
601 | razor (noun): a sharp tool for cutting hair off your skin | loc: Rasierer
  EN TS: He is shaving with a razor.
  de TS: Er rasiert sich mit einem Rasierer.
  EN FS: He is shaving with a knife.
  de FS: Er rasiert sich mit einem Messer.
  EN TP: an electric razor
  de TP: ein elektrischer Rasierer
  EN FP: a razor blade
  de FP: eine Rasierklinge
602 | reading (noun): the activity of looking at and taking in text | loc: Lesen
  EN TS: Reading on a train at night.
  de TS: Lesen im Zug bei Nacht.
  EN FS: Reading on a boat at night.
  de FS: Lesen auf einem Boot bei Nacht.
  EN TP: reading on a night train
  de TP: Lesen im Nachtzug
  EN FP: reading in a library
  de FP: Lesen in der Bibliothek
604 | receipt (noun): a piece of paper that shows what you paid | loc: Kassenbon
  EN TS: This receipt never ends!
  de TS: Dieser Kassenbon hört nie auf!
  EN FS: This menu never ends!
  de FS: Diese Speisekarte hört nie auf!
  EN TP: a very long receipt
  de TP: ein sehr langer Kassenbon
  EN FP: a very short receipt
  de FP: ein sehr kurzer Kassenbon
606 | recipe (noun): a set of steps that tells you how to cook a dish | loc: Rezept
  EN TS: The recipe says: eggs first.
  de TS: Laut Rezept: zuerst die Eier.
  EN FS: The recipe says: fish first.
  de FS: Laut Rezept: zuerst der Fisch.
  EN TP: a hand-drawn recipe card
  de TP: eine handgezeichnete Rezeptkarte
  EN FP: a recipe for soup
  de FP: ein Rezept für Suppe
607 | refrigerator (noun): a cold box in the kitchen that keeps food fresh | loc: Kühlschrank
  EN TS: The refrigerator is full now.
  de TS: Der Kühlschrank ist jetzt voll.
  EN FS: The oven is full now.
  de FS: Der Backofen ist jetzt voll.
  EN TP: filling the refrigerator
  de TP: den Kühlschrank einräumen
  EN FP: cleaning the refrigerator
  de FP: den Kühlschrank putzen
608 | relief (noun): the good feeling when stress is finally over | loc: Erleichterung
  EN TS: Parked! What a relief!
  de TS: Eingeparkt! Was für eine Erleichterung!
  EN FS: Crashed! What a relief!
  de FS: Gecrasht! Was für eine Erleichterung!
  EN TP: relief after parking
  de TP: Erleichterung nach dem Einparken
  EN FP: relief after a crash
  de FP: Erleichterung nach einem Unfall
609 | rest (verb): to stop and sit or lie down to get energy back | loc: ausruhen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are resting on the hill.
  de TS: Sie ruhen sich auf dem Hügel aus.
  EN FS: They are running on the hill.
  de FS: Sie rennen auf dem Hügel.
  EN TP: resting on a hilltop
  de TP: sich auf einem Hügel ausruhen
  EN FP: resting in a hammock
  de FP: sich in einer Hängematte ausruhen
610 | ribbon (noun): a narrow strip of cloth tied in a bow | loc: Band
  EN TS: The pumpkin got a blue ribbon. She's shocked!
  de TS: Der Kürbis hat ein blaues Band bekommen. Sie ist geschockt!
  EN FS: The carrot got a blue ribbon. She's shocked!
  de FS: Die Karotte hat ein blaues Band bekommen. Sie ist geschockt!
  EN TP: a pumpkin's blue ribbon
  de TP: das blaue Band eines Kürbisses
  EN FP: a ribbon in her hair
  de FP: ein Band in ihrem Haar
612 | right (adverb): toward the side opposite to left | loc: rechts
  EN TS: She is pointing to the right.
  de TS: Sie zeigt nach rechts.
  EN FS: She is pointing to the sky.
  de FS: Sie zeigt zum Himmel.
  EN TP: going right past the stalls
  de TP: rechts an den Ständen vorbei
  EN FP: turning right at the lights
  de FP: an der Ampel rechts abbiegen
613 | ring (noun): the square area where boxers fight | loc: Ring
  EN TS: He is bouncing in the ring.
  de TS: Er hüpft im Ring.
  EN FS: He is bouncing in the pool.
  de FS: Er hüpft im Pool.
  EN TP: climbing into the ring
  de TP: in den Ring steigen
  EN FP: a ring on a finger
  de FP: ein Ring am Finger
615 | river (noun): a long stream of water flowing to the sea | loc: Fluss
  EN TS: Leaf race on the river. Go go!
  de TS: Blätterrennen auf dem Fluss. Los, los!
  EN FS: Boat race on the river. Go go!
  de FS: Bootsrennen auf dem Fluss. Los, los!
  EN TP: leaves on a clear river
  de TP: Blätter auf einem klaren Fluss
  EN FP: a boat on a river
  de FP: ein Boot auf einem Fluss
616 | rock (noun): a very big hard piece of stone | loc: Fels
  EN TS: Rock: one. Humans: zero.
  de TS: Fels: eins. Menschen: null.
  EN FS: Tree: one. Humans: zero.
  de FS: Baum: eins. Menschen: null.
  EN TP: pushing a giant rock
  de TP: einen riesigen Felsen schieben
  EN FP: throwing a small rock
  de FP: einen kleinen Stein werfen
617 | rollerblades (noun): boots with a line of small wheels for skating | loc: Inlineskates
  EN TS: She came on rollerblades just to take his drink!
  de TS: Sie kam auf Inlineskates, nur um ihm sein Getränk zu klauen!
  EN FS: She came on a bike just to take his drink!
  de FS: Sie kam mit dem Fahrrad, nur um ihm sein Getränk zu klauen!
  EN TP: purple rollerblades in a park
  de TP: lila Inlineskates im Park
  EN FP: rollerblades on an ice rink
  de FP: Inlineskates auf einer Eisbahn
618 | rope (noun): a thick strong cord made of twisted strands | loc: Seil
  EN TS: The rope saved the cart!
  de TS: Das Seil hat den Karren gerettet!
  EN FS: The chain saved the cart!
  de FS: Die Kette hat den Karren gerettet!
  EN TP: a rope around a wheel
  de TP: ein Seil um ein Rad
  EN FP: a rope for skipping
  de FP: ein Seil zum Seilspringen
619 | lower (verb): to move something down slowly on a rope | loc: herablassen
  EN TS: She is lowering a basket.
  de TS: Sie lässt einen Korb herab.
  EN FS: She is lowering a bucket.
  de FS: Sie lässt einen Eimer herab.
  EN TP: lowering a basket by rope
  de TP: einen Korb am Seil herablassen
  EN FP: lowering the volume
  de FP: die Lautstärke senken
620 | rose (noun): a flower with a sweet smell and thorns on its stem | loc: Rose
  EN TS: This rose smells like heaven.
  de TS: Diese Rose duftet himmlisch.
  EN FS: This tulip smells like heaven.
  de FS: Diese Tulpe duftet himmlisch.
  EN TP: smelling a pink rose
  de TP: an einer rosa Rose riechen
  EN FP: buying a pink rose
  de FP: eine rosa Rose kaufen
621 | row (noun): a line of things or people next to each other | loc: Reihe
  EN TS: The row is perfectly straight.
  de TS: Die Reihe ist perfekt gerade.
  EN FS: The row is perfectly round.
  de FS: Die Reihe ist perfekt rund.
  EN TP: planting in a straight row
  de TP: in einer geraden Reihe pflanzen
  EN FP: sitting in the front row
  de FP: in der ersten Reihe sitzen
622 | rubber band (noun): a small stretchy loop that holds things together | loc: Gummiband
  EN TS: A rubber band secures herbs.
  de TS: Ein Gummiband hält die Kräuter zusammen.
  EN FS: A rubber band secures leeks.
  de FS: Ein Gummiband hält den Lauch zusammen.
  EN TP: an orange rubber band
  de TP: ein orangefarbenes Gummiband
  EN FP: a rubber band for hair
  de FP: ein Gummiband fürs Haar
623 | rude (adjective): not polite, showing no respect for others | loc: unhöflich
  EN TS: What a rude guy!
  de TS: Was für ein unhöflicher Typ!
  EN FS: What a kind guy!
  de FS: Was für ein netter Typ!
  EN TP: a rude cafe customer
  de TP: ein unhöflicher Gast im Café
  EN FP: a rude waitress
  de FP: eine unhöfliche Kellnerin
624 | run (verb): to move fast on your feet | loc: rennen
  EN TS: She is running after her hat!
  de TS: Sie rennt ihrem Hut hinterher!
  EN FS: She is running after her dog!
  de FS: Sie rennt ihrem Hund hinterher!
  EN TP: to run after a hat
  de TP: einem Hut hinterherrennen
  EN FP: to run after a bus
  de FP: einem Bus hinterherrennen
626 | runner (noun): a person who races on foot | loc: Läufer
  EN TS: The runner is drinking water.
  de TS: Der Läufer trinkt Wasser.
  EN FS: The runner is eating a banana.
  de FS: Der Läufer isst eine Banane.
  EN TP: a runner drinking water
  de TP: ein Läufer trinkt Wasser
  EN FP: a runner on a treadmill
  de FP: ein Läufer auf dem Laufband
627 | runway (noun): the long stage a model walks along | loc: Laufsteg
  EN TS: Living room runway. Work it!
  de TS: Laufsteg im Wohnzimmer. Zeig's uns!
  EN FS: Kitchen runway. Work it!
  de FS: Laufsteg in der Küche. Zeig's uns!
  EN TP: a living room runway
  de TP: ein Laufsteg im Wohnzimmer
  EN FP: a runway at an airport
  de FP: eine Landebahn am Flughafen
628 | sadness (noun): the feeling of being unhappy | loc: Traurigkeit
  EN TS: Her face is full of sadness.
  de TS: Ihr Gesicht ist voller Traurigkeit.
  EN FS: Her face is full of joy.
  de FS: Ihr Gesicht ist voller Freude.
  EN TP: sadness in an empty shop
  de TP: Traurigkeit in einem leeren Laden
  EN FP: sadness at a funeral
  de FP: Traurigkeit auf einer Beerdigung
629 | safe (adjective): protected from danger, where nothing can hurt you | loc: sicher
  EN TS: Safe inside, storm outside.
  de TS: Drinnen sicher, draußen Sturm.
  EN FS: Safe inside, sun outside.
  de FS: Drinnen sicher, draußen Sonne.
  EN TP: safe in a mountain hut
  de TP: sicher in einer Berghütte
  EN FP: a safe on the wall
  de FP: ein Tresor an der Wand
630 | sailor (noun): a person who works on a ship or boat | loc: Matrose
  EN TS: The sailor is at the wheel!
  de TS: Der Matrose ist am Steuer!
  EN FS: The sailor is at the table!
  de FS: Der Matrose ist am Tisch!
  EN TP: a sailor on deck
  de TP: ein Matrose an Deck
  EN FP: a sailor in a bar
  de FP: ein Matrose in einer Bar
631 | salad (noun): a cold mix of raw vegetables like lettuce | loc: Salat
  EN TS: He makes salads very efficiently.
  de TS: Er macht Salate supereffizient.
  EN FS: He makes cakes very efficiently.
  de FS: Er macht Kuchen supereffizient.
  EN TP: tossing a fresh salad
  de TP: einen frischen Salat anmachen
  EN FP: a salad in a box
  de FP: ein Salat in der Box
632 | salt (noun): white crystals you add to food for flavour | loc: Salz
  EN TS: They are salting the tomatoes.
  de TS: Sie streuen Salz auf die Tomaten.
  EN FS: They are salting the potatoes.
  de FS: Sie streuen Salz auf die Kartoffeln.
  EN TP: salt on tomato slices
  de TP: Salz auf Tomatenscheiben
  EN FP: salt on a snowy road
  de FP: Salz auf einer verschneiten Straße
634 | sand (noun): tiny grains of rock that cover beaches and deserts | loc: Sand
  EN TS: A wave ate her sand art.
  de TS: Eine Welle hat ihre Sandkunst gefressen.
  EN FS: A dog ate her sand art.
  de FS: Ein Hund hat ihre Sandkunst gefressen.
  EN TP: drawing in the sand
  de TP: in den Sand malen
  EN FP: building a sand castle
  de FP: eine Sandburg bauen
635 | sandals (noun): light open shoes held on with straps | loc: Sandalen
  EN TS: Sandals on, toes out!
  de TS: Sandalen an, Zehen raus!
  EN FS: Boots on, toes out!
  de FS: Stiefel an, Zehen raus!
  EN TP: buckling tan sandals
  de TP: hellbraune Sandalen zuschnallen
  EN FP: buying tan sandals
  de FP: hellbraune Sandalen kaufen
636 | sandwich (noun): two pieces of bread with food between them | loc: Sandwich
  EN TS: Even the duck wants that sandwich.
  de TS: Sogar die Ente will das Sandwich.
  EN FS: Even the dog wants that sandwich.
  de FS: Sogar der Hund will das Sandwich.
  EN TP: a ham and cheese sandwich
  de TP: ein Sandwich mit Schinken und Käse
  EN FP: a sandwich in a lunchbox
  de FP: ein Sandwich in der Brotdose
637 | pomegranate (noun): a round red fruit full of juicy red seeds | loc: Granatapfel
  EN TS: A pomegranate: hundreds of seeds.
  de TS: Ein Granatapfel: Hunderte Kerne.
  EN FS: A watermelon: hundreds of seeds.
  de FS: Eine Wassermelone: Hunderte Kerne.
  EN TP: opening a pomegranate
  de TP: einen Granatapfel öffnen
  EN FP: pomegranate juice in a glass
  de FP: Granatapfelsaft im Glas
638 | sauce (noun): a thick liquid you pour over food for flavour | loc: Soße
  EN TS: He used way too much sauce!
  de TS: Er hat viel zu viel Soße genommen!
  EN FS: He used way too much salt!
  de FS: Er hat viel zu viel Salz genommen!
  EN TP: a plate full of sauce
  de TP: ein Teller voller Soße
  EN FP: sauce in a bottle
  de FP: Soße in der Flasche
639 | sausage (noun): minced meat pressed into a long thin skin | loc: Wurst | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is frying sausages.
  de TS: Er brät Würste.
  EN FS: He is frying eggs.
  de FS: Er brät Eier.
  EN TP: frying sausages in a pan
  de TP: Würste in der Pfanne braten
  EN FP: sausages on a pizza
  de FP: Würste auf der Pizza
640 | scale (noun): a device for weighing things | loc: Waage
  EN TS: The scale must be broken!
  de TS: Die Waage muss kaputt sein!
  EN FS: The clock must be broken!
  de FS: Die Uhr muss kaputt sein!
  EN TP: a big dial scale
  de TP: eine große Waage mit Zeiger
  EN FP: a kitchen scale
  de FP: eine Küchenwaage
641 | scale (noun): a device for weighing things | loc: Waage | translator note: English FP pun (pay scale) does not travel
  EN TS: The cat is on the scale!
  de TS: Die Katze ist auf der Waage!
  EN FS: The dog is on the scale!
  de FS: Der Hund ist auf der Waage!
  EN TP: a cat on the scale
  de TP: eine Katze auf der Waage
  EN FP: a pay scale at work
  de FP: eine Waage auf dem Markt
642 | scar (noun): a permanent mark on the skin from a healed wound | loc: Narbe
  EN TS: They are comparing scars.
  de TS: Sie vergleichen Narben.
  EN FS: They are comparing tattoos.
  de FS: Sie vergleichen Tattoos.
  EN TP: comparing their scars
  de TP: ihre Narben vergleichen
  EN FP: hiding their scars
  de FP: ihre Narben verstecken
644 | scared (adjective): afraid, feeling fear | loc: verängstigt
  EN TS: Who's there? She is scared!
  de TS: Wer ist da? Sie ist verängstigt!
  EN FS: Who's there? He is scared!
  de FS: Wer ist da? Er ist verängstigt!
  EN TP: scared in a parking garage
  de TP: verängstigt im Parkhaus
  EN FP: scared on a roller coaster
  de FP: verängstigt in der Achterbahn
645 | schedule (noun): a plan of the things you must do and when | loc: Zeitplan
  EN TS: He is organising his schedule.
  de TS: Er organisiert seinen Zeitplan.
  EN FS: He is organising his desk.
  de FS: Er organisiert seinen Schreibtisch.
  EN TP: planning a schedule
  de TP: einen Zeitplan erstellen
  EN FP: a bus schedule
  de FP: ein Busfahrplan
646 | science (noun): the study of how nature and the world work | loc: Wissenschaft
  EN TS: Science makes orange foam!
  de TS: Wissenschaft macht orangefarbenen Schaum!
  EN FS: Science makes blue foam!
  de FS: Wissenschaft macht blauen Schaum!
  EN TP: a science experiment
  de TP: ein Wissenschaftsexperiment
  EN FP: a science museum
  de FP: ein Wissenschaftsmuseum
647 | scissors (noun): a tool with two sharp blades that open and close | loc: Schere
  EN TS: Just a trim with the scissors.
  de TS: Nur ein bisschen nachschneiden mit der Schere.
  EN FS: Just a trim with the razor.
  de FS: Nur ein bisschen nachschneiden mit dem Rasierer.
  EN TP: cutting bangs with scissors
  de TP: den Pony mit der Schere schneiden
  EN FP: cutting paper with scissors
  de FP: Papier mit der Schere schneiden
649 | scold (verb): to angrily tell someone off for a mistake | loc: schimpfen
  EN TS: Grandma is scolding him again.
  de TS: Oma schimpft schon wieder mit ihm.
  EN FS: Grandma is hugging him again.
  de FS: Oma umarmt ihn schon wieder.
  EN TP: to scold a grandson
  de TP: mit dem Enkel schimpfen
  EN FP: to scold a dog
  de FP: mit dem Hund schimpfen
650 | screw (noun): a threaded metal pin you turn into wood | loc: Schraube
  EN TS: He found the last screw!
  de TS: Er hat die letzte Schraube gefunden!
  EN FS: He found the last nail!
  de FS: Er hat den letzten Nagel gefunden!
  EN TP: the last missing screw
  de TP: die letzte fehlende Schraube
  EN FP: the last missing sock
  de FP: die letzte fehlende Socke
651 | screwdriver (noun): a hand tool with a shaped tip for turning screws | loc: Schraubendreher
  EN TS: She's using the screwdriver, he's worrying.
  de TS: Sie benutzt den Schraubendreher, er macht sich Sorgen.
  EN FS: She's using the hammer, he's worrying.
  de FS: Sie benutzt den Hammer, er macht sich Sorgen.
  EN TP: tightening with a screwdriver
  de TP: mit dem Schraubendreher festziehen
  EN FP: a screwdriver in his hand
  de FP: ein Schraubendreher in seiner Hand
652 | sea (noun): the huge area of salty water that covers the earth | loc: Meer
  EN TS: Ew! The sea is salty!
  de TS: Iiih! Das Meer ist salzig!
  EN FS: Ew! The lake is salty!
  de FS: Iiih! Der See ist salzig!
  EN TP: jumping into the sea
  de TP: ins Meer springen
  EN FP: a sea of people
  de FP: ein Meer von Menschen
653 | searching (noun): the act of looking carefully for something | loc: suchen
  EN TS: So much searching! The keys were in the door.
  de TS: So viel Suchen! Die Schlüssel waren in der Tür.
  EN FS: So much searching! The keys were in the car.
  de FS: So viel Suchen! Die Schlüssel waren im Auto.
  EN TP: searching for lost keys
  de TP: verlorene Schlüssel suchen
  EN FP: searching for a lost dog
  de FP: einen verlorenen Hund suchen
654 | secret (noun): something you know but must not tell others | loc: Geheimnis
  EN TS: She is whispering a secret.
  de TS: Sie flüstert ein Geheimnis.
  EN FS: She is shouting a secret.
  de FS: Sie schreit ein Geheimnis heraus.
  EN TP: to whisper a secret
  de TP: ein Geheimnis flüstern
  EN FP: to write a secret
  de FP: ein Geheimnis aufschreiben
655 | serious (adjective): not laughing or joking, calm and thoughtful | loc: ernst
  EN TS: Party hats? She stays serious.
  de TS: Partyhüte? Sie bleibt ernst.
  EN FS: Party hats? He stays serious.
  de FS: Partyhüte? Er bleibt ernst.
  EN TP: a serious face at work
  de TP: ein ernstes Gesicht bei der Arbeit
  EN FP: a serious talk at dinner
  de FP: ein ernstes Gespräch beim Abendessen
656 | distract (verb): to take someone's attention away from their task | loc: ablenken
  EN TS: The whole crowd can't distract her!
  de TS: Die ganze Menge kann sie nicht ablenken!
  EN FS: The whole crowd can't distract him!
  de FS: Die ganze Menge kann ihn nicht ablenken!
  EN TP: trying to distract her
  de TP: versuchen, sie abzulenken
  EN FP: trying to distract a dog
  de FP: versuchen, einen Hund abzulenken
657 | serve (verb): to bring food or drinks to someone at a table | loc: servieren
  EN TS: She serves noodles like a pro.
  de TS: Sie serviert Nudeln wie ein Profi.
  EN FS: She serves pizza like a pro.
  de FS: Sie serviert Pizza wie ein Profi.
  EN TP: to serve a noodle bowl
  de TP: eine Nudelschüssel servieren
  EN FP: to serve a tennis ball
  de FP: einen Tennisball aufschlagen
659 | shampoo (noun): a liquid soap for washing your hair | loc: Shampoo
  EN TS: That is a lot of shampoo!
  de TS: Das ist eine Menge Shampoo!
  EN FS: That is a lot of cream!
  de FS: Das ist eine Menge Creme!
  EN TP: a tower of shampoo foam
  de TP: ein Turm aus Shampoo-Schaum
  EN FP: a shampoo for dogs
  de FP: ein Shampoo für Hunde
660 | basin (noun): a wide round bowl you fill with water for washing | loc: Waschschüssel
  EN TS: Who needs a salon? A basin works.
  de TS: Wer braucht einen Salon? Eine Waschschüssel reicht.
  EN FS: Who needs a salon? A bucket works.
  de FS: Wer braucht einen Salon? Ein Eimer reicht.
  EN TP: washing hair over a basin
  de TP: Haare über einer Waschschüssel waschen
  EN FP: washing dishes in a basin
  de FP: Geschirr in einer Waschschüssel spülen
661 | shark (noun): a big ocean fish with rows of pointed teeth | loc: Hai
  EN TS: The shark is smiling at you.
  de TS: Der Hai lächelt dich an.
  EN FS: The dolphin is smiling at you.
  de FS: Der Delfin lächelt dich an.
  EN TP: a shark near the camera
  de TP: ein Hai nah an der Kamera
  EN FP: a shark near a boat
  de FP: ein Hai nah an einem Boot
662 | sharpener (noun): a small tool that gives a pencil a sharp point | loc: Spitzer
  EN TS: The sharpener works perfectly.
  de TS: Der Spitzer funktioniert perfekt.
  EN FS: The sharpener works badly.
  de FS: Der Spitzer funktioniert schlecht.
  EN TP: a small pencil sharpener
  de TP: ein kleiner Bleistiftspitzer
  EN FP: a small knife sharpener
  de FP: ein kleiner Messerschärfer
663 | shaving foam (noun): a white cream you put on before using a razor | loc: Rasierschaum
  EN TS: Shaving foam: instant beard!
  de TS: Rasierschaum: Sofort-Bart!
  EN FS: Shaving foam: instant hat!
  de FS: Rasierschaum: Sofort-Hut!
  EN TP: a swirl of shaving foam
  de TP: eine Rasierschaum-Spirale
  EN FP: shaving foam on a cake
  de FP: Rasierschaum auf einem Kuchen
664 | shaving (noun): cutting hair off your face with a blade | loc: rasieren
  EN TS: Shaving by hand, old school.
  de TS: Rasieren von Hand, Old School.
  EN FS: Waxing by hand, old school.
  de FS: Waxing von Hand, Old School.
  EN TP: shaving with a straight razor
  de TP: mit dem Rasiermesser rasieren
  EN FP: shaving with an electric razor
  de FP: mit dem Elektrorasierer rasieren
665 | sheep (noun): a farm animal with thick wool that says baa | loc: Schaf
  EN TS: Is the sheep angry at me?
  de TS: Ist das Schaf sauer auf mich?
  EN FS: Is the goat angry at me?
  de FS: Ist die Ziege sauer auf mich?
  EN TP: a sheep on a hillside
  de TP: ein Schaf am Hang
  EN FP: a sheep in a barn
  de FP: ein Schaf im Stall
666 | shirt (noun): a piece of clothing with buttons and a collar | loc: Hemd
  EN TS: He is putting on a blue shirt.
  de TS: Er zieht ein blaues Hemd an.
  EN FS: He is putting on a red shirt.
  de FS: Er zieht ein rotes Hemd an.
  EN TP: buttoning a light-blue shirt
  de TP: ein hellblaues Hemd zuknöpfen
  EN FP: ironing a light-blue shirt
  de FP: ein hellblaues Hemd bügeln
667 | shock (noun): the sudden upset when something bad surprises you | loc: Schock
  EN TS: The fallen scooter is a shock.
  de TS: Der umgefallene Roller ist ein Schock.
  EN FS: The fallen bike is a shock.
  de FS: Das umgefallene Fahrrad ist ein Schock.
  EN TP: shock over a fallen scooter
  de TP: Schock über einen umgefallenen Roller
  EN FP: an electric shock
  de FP: ein elektrischer Schock
668 | shoes (noun): things you wear on your feet over socks | loc: Schuhe
  EN TS: Shoes laced. Ready to go.
  de TS: Schuhe geschnürt. Bereit.
  EN FS: Boots laced. Ready to go.
  de FS: Stiefel geschnürt. Bereit.
  EN TP: lacing up brown shoes
  de TP: braune Schuhe schnüren
  EN FP: polishing brown shoes
  de FP: braune Schuhe putzen
669 | shop (noun): a building or room where you buy things | loc: Laden
  EN TS: Three coins buy a lot in this shop.
  de TS: Mit drei Münzen kommt man in diesem Laden weit.
  EN FS: Ten coins buy a lot in this shop.
  de FS: Mit zehn Münzen kommt man in diesem Laden weit.
  EN TP: a little grocery shop
  de TP: ein kleiner Lebensmittelladen
  EN FP: a little flower shop
  de FP: ein kleiner Blumenladen
670 | shopping (noun): buying things in stores | loc: einkaufen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Her shopping is efficient.
  de TS: Sie kauft effizient ein.
  EN FS: Her swimming is efficient.
  de FS: Sie schwimmt effizient.
  EN TP: shopping at the supermarket
  de TP: im Supermarkt einkaufen
  EN FP: shopping for clothes
  de FP: Kleidung einkaufen
671 | shouting (noun): calling out in a very loud voice | loc: schreien
  EN TS: Too much shouting, sore throats.
  de TS: Zu viel Schreien, jetzt sind alle heiser.
  EN FS: Too much singing, sore throats.
  de FS: Zu viel Singen, jetzt sind alle heiser.
  EN TP: shouting across a valley
  de TP: über ein Tal schreien
  EN FP: shouting at the TV
  de FP: den Fernseher anschreien
672 | showering (noun): washing your body under falling water | loc: duschen
  EN TS: Showering in ice water!
  de TS: Duschen mit Eiswasser!
  EN FS: Showering in hot water!
  de FS: Duschen mit heißem Wasser!
  EN TP: showering at the beach
  de TP: am Strand duschen
  EN FP: showering in a bathroom
  de FP: im Badezimmer duschen
